Authors
The Phantom (The Phantom)
Number of Reviews
23

Title
Review for Stepfather II (1989)
     First, the Phantom must apologize for leaving his phans in the lurch these
past three weeks.  STEPFATHER 2 was released almost two weeks ago, and it was
only the bad taste left in the Phantom's mouth by seeing Robert Englund portray
his namesake in PHANTOM OF THE OPERA that prevented him from attending
STEPFATHER 2 on opening night.
     (Because PHANTOM OF THE OPERA is, in the Phantom's opinion, a complete
waste of time, he refers his phans to Mark Leeper's review for details, as well
as reasons why it should be avoided even after it hits your local
Blockbusters.)
     But the good news is that STEPFATHER 2 is as good as PHANTOM was bad.  For
those who haven't seen the original STEPFATHER, you should make a special point
of picking it up on video.  Even the usually stingy Leonard Maltin gives it
three stars; in the Phantom's opinion, it's really worth four -- he thinks it's
in the same league as THE HAUNTING and INVASION OF THE BODY SNATCHERS.
     Both the original STEPFATHER and the current sequel are based on a
character who on the surface is the perfect husband and father, a Mr.  Rogers
who can cook and teach little Timmy how to play ball.  Perfect, that is, until
things don't go according to his very strict and exact plans.  Then ... well,
the Phantom is sure you can conjure up the scenario.  But STEPFATHER 2 is not a
splatter film; although there are some bloody scenes, it's really more of a
thriller than a run-of-the-mill slash and trash film.
     And what a very good thriller it is.  After a somewhat slow opening set in
a mental hospital, the pace really picks up and the Phantom found himself
completely absorbed in the story.  Although STEPFATHER 2 suffers to some small
degree from sequelitis, and although the director Jeff Burr does not have the
same light touch and feel for atmospherics as did Joseph Ruben (the director of
the original, who most recently was involved with TRUE BELIEVER), STEPFATHER 2
works well both as a sequel and as a film in its own right.  There's no need to
see the original to understand the plot of the sequel; and in fact those who
see the current installment before renting the original will most likely enjoy
it even more, since they won't be able to compare it to its admittedly more
able predecessor.
     The plot of STEPFATHER 2 will be familiar to those who have seen the
original: After escaping from the mental hospital in which he's been serving
his sentence for the grisly results of the first film, our friendly domestic
fiend moves to southern California and sets up practice as a psychiatrist,
specializing in group counseling for women (how very convenient).  He also very
conveniently moves in across the street from a recent widow and her son, and
spends the majority of the film ingratiating himself with them and, finally,
marrying and becoming a stepfather yet again.
     Lest the Phantom make all this out to be routine and predictable, he
should say that while the plot of STEPFATHER 2 is simple (as was the plot of
the first), it is very well executed and usually stays a step ahead of its
audience -- no mean trick when everyone knows the film's outcome even before
buying their popcorn.  It is also refreshing to see that a horror film can be
made without having to rely on artificial plot twists and unbelievable actions;
after SHOCKER, the Phantom had his doubts.
     The acting, dialogue, and cinematography are all quite good, and Terry
O'Quinn's performance as the stepfather is a standout -- his screen presence is
once again very disturbing, and in fact he seems as born to this role as
Anthony Perkins is to playing Norman Bates.  As an added bonus, Jim Manzie's
score is excellent and adds noticeably to the suspense throughout the film.  A
good score can sometimes save a terrible film, but it will always enhance a
good one, and with STEPFATHER 2 (as with HALLOWEEN) the latter is most
definitely the case.
     What more can the Phantom say?  He paid full price and doesn't regret it
-- truly, what more glowing tribute could there be?  Take time and see this one
while it's still playing at a theater near you, before its effect is reduced to
19" and it has to compete with your answering machine.
     The Phantom also urges any of his phans who may have missed the original
to rush out to their local Blockbusters and rent it; it is truly a classic,
although even its most generous phan would have to call it a little-known
sleeper.
     And to those who missed STEPFATHER 2 because of the Phantom's rather tardy
review, he apologizes profusely and sentences himself to watching all 97 FRIDAY
THE 13TH sequels, one after the other, until he is reduced to an quivering,
inarticulate, knee-jerk social critic.  Then he'll be ready to write articles
about the great human cost of horror films and their effect on our children and
on our society for the Sunday New York Times Arts and Leisure section.  Even
Clive Barker couldn't dream up a more agonizing punishment....

Title
Review for Due occhi diabolici (1990)
     When two of the most legendary names in horror collaborate on a new
film, the Phantom drops what's he's doing and heads for the cinema.
After all, George A. Romero doesn't make a new horror film every day,
and Dario Argento's films rarely, if ever, see the light of day -- so to
speak -- in American movie houses.  Since most studios and distributors
believe that our taste in horror runs more toward the staid and
predictable, Italian horror is infrequently seen as it should be: on the
big screen.  All too often it is released directly to video; sometimes
it is simply not available at all.
     Now, Italian horror is somewhat of an acquired taste -- unlike
American directors, filmmakers like Argento tend to concentrate more on
atmosphere and gore than on plot and character development.  Italian
horror films may suffer somewhat for these omissions, just as they
usually suffer from excruciatingly bad dubbing and jumpy editing, and in
general we're not likely to see an Italian HENRY: PORTRAIT OF A SERIAL
KILLER.  Argento and his fellow horror filmmakers (including Mario Bava,
his son Lamberto, and Lucio Fulci) tend to avoid the subtle and go
straight for the body parts, sharpened household implements, and
bathtubs filled with blood.  However, the Phantom would rather watch the
ridiculously plotted, poorly edited, nearly nonsensical GATES OF HELL
any day than another tedious CHILD'S PLAY or NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET
sequel.  Italian horror is a lot like Domino's pizza: it leaves a lot to
be desired, but you know it'll deliver.
     So instead of SUSPIRIA, we get FREDDY'S DEAD, while another batch
of newly installed studio executives wonder why the American movie-going
public no longer wants to see horror films (even if they're filmed in
headache-inducing "Freddy-Vision").  Alas, the last Italian horror film
the Phantom remembers seeing on the big screen is GATES OF HELL, and
that was back in 1983.  Before that it was Fulci's ZOMBIE, a full three
years earlier.
     But here we are eight years after GATES OF HELL was released, faced
with TWO EVIL EYES in a rather limited engagement at a handful of
theaters across the country.  It's being distributed by tiny Taurus
Entertainment, which means it's got one foot in Blockbusters even before
the opening credits roll; their releases tend to arrive for the briefest
of runs and then head straight for video stores across the country,
ensuring only that most people have a vague sense when they're in their
local video stores that the film they're pondering was, in fact, a
theatrical release at one point and not just another sleazy
"direct-to-video" quickie.  "But how did I miss this one?"  they may ask
themselves.  "I make a real effort to see new horror in the cinema,
where the screams of the audience around me add to the fun, and where I
can talk back to the characters on the screen and tell them what to do
in a setting where that sort of behavior -- speaking out loud to
fictional characters -- is socially acceptable rather than an
early-warning sign of a severe personality disorder" they may say.
     Well, perhaps they may not say all that, but at least some of it is
likely going through their minds as they fish through their wallets for
their video rental cards.  And that's the only reason why TWO EVIL EYES
is now in theatrical release at all, as the film itself has all the
hallmarks of a sleazy, "direct-to-video" quickie.  Romero and Argento
fooled the Phantom a bit with this one, or at least the advertisements
for the film fooled him, as he was led to believe that TWO EVIL EYES was
a single, full-length feature film produced, written and directed by two
of the best horror filmmakers working today.
     In fact, TWO EVIL EYES is more like two "Tales from the Crypt"
episodes seen back-to-back.  Romero and Argento each pay homage to Edgar
Allen Poe (who doesn't need any more homages of this sort, the Phantom
is quite sure) by butchering two or three of his stories and stitching
them back together in rather uncertain fashion.  As the Phantom isn't
really up on his Poe (it's been a long time since he's read any of the
Master's work), he didn't mind the obvious cut-and-paste effort, but he
suspects that some of his more literate phans may take umbrage at the
appropriation of Poe's name and short stories by two directors who
aren't known for producing particularly well-considered or literate
films.  Let's just say that Roger Corman and Vincent Price did it all
better thirty years ago.
     Putting that minor quibble aside, the two segments are quite uneven
even judged on their own merits.  As one might expect, Argento's piece,
"The Black Cat," is by far the better, as Romero has been trading on his
name for years now, not having done anything of value since DAY OF THE
DEAD.  His piece, "The Curious Facts in the Case of M. Valdemar,"
plays exactly like an extended CREEPSHOW segment.  There's enough
material for 30 minutes -- the piece would certainly be at home on
"Tales from the Crypt" -- but Romero stretches it out to an hour, and
even Adrienne Barbeau's bad acting can't save it.  Perhaps if he had had
the foresight to cast Rae Dawn Chong instead, the audience would at
least have been horrified, if not terror-struck.
     "Valdemar" is about what happens to a man who dies while under
hypnosis, but what happens wouldn't make Poe very happy, since his short
stories never put anyone to sleep -- and the Phantom came surprisingly
close to nodding off once or twice himself.  He certainly wasn't helped
by the very cold temperature of the theater in which he saw the film --
evidently the thermostat had been set on the assumption that more than
five warm bodies would be in attendance -- but Romero's leaden script
and relentless focus on a metronome might have been sufficient in and of
themselves.  It was almost as if he wanted to treat the audience to a
taste of what M. Valdemar was experiencing, and although we all waited
patiently to be brought out of our trances, Romero never once counted to
five nor snapped his cinematic fingers.  Suffice it to say that with the
exception of a few creepy voice effects and a rather well-done special
effect right at the end of the piece (which accomplishes little but
remind us why a good story well told doesn't need *any* special effects
-- something with which Poe likely would agree), there's not much reason
to be in the audience for the first hour of TWO EVIL EYES.
     "The Black Cat," however, is a different story altogether.  It,
too, has been butchered beyond recognition -- it contains bits and
pieces of at least three Poe stories -- but it hardly matters as Argento
has never felt the need to be constrained by story lines or logic.
Instead, he uses the story elements to fashion a tale of a man who may
or may not be descending into madness with the help of a stray black cat
his girlfriend finds outside the apartment one day.
     Naturally the man is a crime photographer -- how else would Argento
logically work a number of lovingly photographed, excessively graphic
multilated bodies into the story?  -- and naturally he has easy access
to a number of sharpened home improvement tools.  The rest is pure
Argento, and while it's not as good as SUSPIRIA (the Phantom's favorite
Argento film), it's still very well done indeed.  Argento gets to
splatter blood everywhere, and his camera work has never been better: in
"The Black Cat" we get the CatCam, the RopeCam, and even the DrainoCam.
And yes, we do get that bathtub filled with blood, which comes just as
the audience begins to think that Argento might not have his heart in
the film after all.
     The acting and dialogue is atrocious, and the editing is shaky --
sometimes quite good, most of the time fairly standard for Italian
horror -- but Argento does a creditable job.  There are -- somewhat
surprisingly -- no Spring-Loaded Cats in "The Black Cat," and it's
obvious that Argento spent some time on the piece and didn't do as
Romero did and just toss this one off.  The Phantom appreciated the
effort even if the results weren't first rate; it may also be that after
having sat through Romero's very undistinguished first hour the Phantom
was more receptive to Argento's work.  There are a reasonable number of
scares in "The Black Cat," and gore galore -- enough to satisfy all but
the most jaded of horror phans.
     In marked contrast, Romero's piece contained no scares at all,
apart from a handful of Spring-Loaded Cat effects.  In fact, Romero
even, at one point, gives us a Spring-Loaded Mop, which is certainly a
first; if nothing else, it one-ups the 90-decibel ringing telephone,
long a mainstay of inept horror films.  Perhaps the Phantom will have to
adopt an SLM quotient to complement his SLC quotient; at the very least,
he sincerely hopes that Romero doesn't decide to throw other household
cleaning implements at us in his upcoming films, as otherwise the
Phantom will never again be able to look under his kitchen sink without
having a quiver of fear run up his spine.
     Argento, on the other hand, wastes no time in focusing his
attention on, of all things, a pendulum.  And not a pendulum from a
grandfather clock, either.  The Phantom knew -- he just knew -- that
Argento wouldn't be able to resist that most vicious of all of Poe's
implements of torture.  As an aside, it may be instructive to note that
while Argento gleefully swings a razor-sharp pendulum at us, Romero
scares us with a mop sliding down the basement stairs.  But guess whose
next feature will be released by a major American film studio?  Is it
any wonder that the audience for serious horror films is as low as it
is?
     All of which leaves the Phantom with mixed feelings about TWO EVIL
EYES.  On the one hand, $7.50 was a lot to pay for what amounted to one
pretty decent short film; on the other, he suspects that most, if not
all, of his phans will ultimately see TWO EVIL EYES on video if they see
it at all.  And in that case, the Phantom really recommends that they
check it out, especially if they're also phans of Dario Argento.  TWO
EVIL EYES is not a great horror film, but half of it isn't half bad at
all.

Title
Review for Popcorn (1991)
     Good horror films are few and far between, but good horror film
spoofs are so rare as to be an endangered species.  POPCORN is, sadly,
not such a rare breed; if RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD or NIGHT OF THE
CREEPS are California condors, POPCORN is more like a New York pigeon:
it's a film that's messy, unavoidable, and not too bright.
     On the other hand, who could argue with the film's tag line, which
is easily the cleverest thing about it.  For weeks before it opened,
advertisements were plastered throughout the New York City subway
system, in every major newspaper, on television, and even in
participating video stores -- which only goes to show that the producers
know where lies their largest audience.  For weeks we read the fruits of
some anonymous advertising exec's late-night brainstorm: "Buy a bag...
go home in a box."  Chilling, no?
     Well, no.  The film's poster is nicely designed and features a
skull hiding behind the mask of a young girl's face.  While this has as
little to do with the film as does the tag line, it does make for an
aesthetically pleasing poster, and given the state of the New York City
subways, the Phantom would never argue against a pleasant-looking --
though terribly misleading -- movie poster.  The film itself features
neither skulls nor bags, and the only box in POPCORN is the one the
writers get themselves into fairly early on.  Happily though, there is
in fact some popcorn in the film, albeit less than there was on the
theater floor during the Phantom's showing.
     What there isn't is even a half-dozen suspenseful scenes, two or
three credible characters, acting at a level above a high school "Our
Town" production, or a remotely believable plot.  Taken at face value,
POPCORN is not exactly food for the hungry horror phan, though if one
ignores the misleading advertising and takes it as what the Phantom will
bet it was intended as -- a relatively harmless and exceedingly mild
spoof of all the corny 1950s horror films we so loved on Saturday
afternoons and late Sunday nights on Chiller Theater -- it's just barely
enough to tide you over until heartier fare is served.
     It took a while before it occurred to the Phantom that the
filmmakers could not possibly have intended us to take POPCORN
seriously, but that points out one of its worst failings as a horror
parody: for a film that was intended to satirize recent and not so
recent horror films, it's neither outrageously funny, ridiculously gory,
laughingly scripted nor paced and acted as if Edward D.  Wood Jr.  --
father of the classic PLAN 9 FROM OUTER SPACE -- were directing from
beyond the grave.  Most of the time, POPCORN just sits there like the
unpopped, bottom-of-the-bag kind of film it is, going through the all
too familiar paces of a half-baked horror sendup.  By the time the film
was half over, the Phantom had thoughts of some of POPCORN's brothers in
horror parody failure: STUDENT BODIES, SATURDAY THE 14TH, TRANSYLVANIA
6-5000.  And his thoughts were these: "I wonder if I should leave now
and get an early start on my tax return."  Sadly, the Phantom's taxes
remain unpaid and as the evening wore on, his dreams for a satisfying
horror film went unfulfilled.
     The plot -- such as it is -- is held together with what turns out
to be yet another spoof, though alas not a very successful one.  While
an audience is assembled to watch a "horror-thon", a vengeful psychopath
takes his revenge (as vengeful psychopaths often do) on the members of
the film school class who are running the show.  These poor folks need
to raise money to continue their brave efforts at independent
filmmaking, or perhaps to exhume Mr.  Wood to direct POPCORN II -- the
Phantom wasn't quite clear on this point, his thoughts having begun
their inexorable drift to the ides of April even at that early stage.
Nonetheless, the resourceful auteurs-to-be shortly set to work at the
horror film spoof equivalent of fixing up the old barn to put on a show:
renovating a local theater palace and preparing to put on a triple-bill
of old horror and science fiction duds from the fifties, evidently
expecting people to pay $10 to see ancient classics presented complete
with their original in-theater special effects, including the miracle of
3-D, the miracle of Shock-O-Vision, and the miracle of Smell-O-Vision.
As the Phantom himself had just paid $7.50 (plus $2 for soda) to see
POPCORN -- in the miracle of Soon-To-Be-On-Cable-Vision -- he wasn't at
all surprised to see the auditorium soon fill to capacity with lovers of
schlock cinema.
     Naturally, once the shows begin the poor film students start
getting dispatched in ways that mirror -- more or less -- the action on
the screen.  Curiously, the action on *their* screen is much more
enjoyable and much better done than is the action on ours.  POPCORN
succeeds to some small degree in satirizing hoary old shockers like
TARANTULA; it does less well with a parody of a random "Incredible Blah
Blah Blah Man" flick, and by the time the film arrives at "The Stench"
-- yes, that's the name, not the review, folks -- the Phantom wasn't
quite sure what on Earth was being sent up.  But the film itself is only
interesting during those brief, voyeuristic periods when we're watching
what everyone in the film is watching.  Once their -- and our --
attention returns to the action in the theater itself, it's time to
start contemplating our withholding statements again.
     But what if the inept action off-screen was *also* intended to be a
parody?  By the time he'd begun to consider whether he was making a
sufficiently large contribution to his IRA, it dawned on the Phantom
that the filmmakers surely could not have meant anyone to take *any* of
the film seriously -- unlike, say, DAWN OF THE DEAD or AN AMERICAN
WEREWOLF IN LONDON, POPCORN was not supposed to be a horror film with
elements of parody.  Instead, they must have intended the film *itself*
to be a spoof.  This put things in a different light, though sadly not
in a more favorable one, for it turns out that POPCORN spends most of
its time attempting unsuccessfully to parody the worst cliches from some
of the worst of the early-eighties slash-and-trash horror films.  In
case you managed to avoid the great tidal waves of FRIDAY THE 13TH
clones and knockoffs that washed up on the shores of the horror cinema a
decade ago, stop by your local Blockbusters and rent the absolute nadir
of the genre, HAPPY BIRTHDAY TO ME.  This is the sort of film where
stupid adolescents are killed with metronome-like regularity in highly
unique and improbable ways by an all-too-obvious killer, who without
fail turns out to be yet another slighted adolescent who decides to do
in the entire senior class because he couldn't get a date for the prom.
It's the sort of film in which the sheer number and kinds of killings
were advertised as pretty much the only reason to see it -- after all,
where else could you see teenagers killed with fireplace pokers and dumb
bells and spatulas and tuning forks and the like?  Best of all, it was
named after a holiday, which as everyone who's been a horror phan since
HALLOWEEN knows is a sure way to make a few extra bucks at the box
office.  We missed GROUND HOG'S DAY: THE SHADOW'S REVENGE, but we got
GRADUATION DAY, MY BLOODY VALENTINE, NEW YEAR'S EVIL, SILENT NIGHT,
DEADLY NIGHT, and on and on.  We even got THE DAY AFTER HALLOWEEN,
surely one of the most cynically titled films of all time (though BEYOND
THE FOG -- a film that had as little to do with THE FOG as THE DAY AFTER
HALLOWEEN had to do with HALLOWEEN -- runs a close second).
     Such films should be simple to parody -- after all, their premises
are so predictable, their "surprises" are so unsurprising, and their
acting and dialog are so awful -- but although POPCORN comes close at
times, it really never has its heart in it -- it never really lets loose
and becomes a classic like NIGHT OF THE CREEPS, EVIL DEAD 2, REANIMATOR
or RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD.  Instead, it's a parody done with the
straightest of faces, one that fritters away its entire first half
setting up a NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET-like plot just to discard it and
head for the ridiculous in the last third of the film.  POPCORN feels a
lot like a film that was designed by a committee, or perhaps a film
started by one person and finished by someone else.  Regardless, it
winds up as an abject failure of a horror film, and a big disappointment
of a horror film parody.
     It's a shame, really, because POPCORN does have some intentionally
-- or so the Phantom assumes -- hilarious moments, and the whole premise
of the film did manage to get the Phantom's mind off his 1040 every so
often.  It might work better, perhaps, for those phans who can remember
seeing horror films in the fifties and sixties, back before the advent
of Cinema 1-2-3-N and video, when in-theater special effects were the
rage and just going to a movie at all was a special event.  The Phantom
himself indulged in some mock nostalgia, since although he's too young
to remember those days, he does have a great fondness for the Rialtos
and Bijous of days gone by.
     But alas, there is little more than that to recommend POPCORN.
Although this is the first horror film (parody or not) to be released in
a couple of months, it's no longer the only one out there, as THE
SILENCE OF THE LAMBS will be in general release in a matter of days.  At
best, POPCORN is the very definition of a "wait for video" horror film,
and then only if all the copies of MISERY have already been rented.
     Horror film parodies are indeed hard to find, and if the Phantom's
review has piqued your curiousity, you might want to give EVIL DEAD 2 a
try (though you should see the first one first, if only so you'll know
what's being parodied).  RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD, directed by Dan
O'Bannon, does a fine job of sending up George Romero's horror classic
-- when shooting a zombie in the head fails to stop it, one character
even says "But it worked in the movie!"  -- and in it's own strange way,
CHILD'S PLAY still stands as one of the best slash-and-trash parodies
ever made (in addition to being a great horror film in its own right).
The $7.50 you'll save by avoiding POPCORN will more than cover the
rental fees for all three of these films, and you'll surely be able to
keep your mind off your taxes longer than the Phantom was able to.
Given that POPCORN will probably appear on video around the middle of
April, this seems particularly appropriate.

Title
Review for Basket Case 2 (1990)
     In his previous review (of NIGHTBREED), the Phantom's lead paragraph was
only slightly less self-referential than this one is, but there he did it only
because he admires style over substance in all things, his own reviews
included.  This review, however, does require the Phantom to discuss some of
the background of BASKET CASE 2, for without it he doesn't know what some of
his phans will make of it.  Certainly if one expects an ordinary "slasher/alien
pops out from behind a headstone/under a staircase and stabs/kills/rips the
limbs off of a hapless teenager just after/just before having sex" horror film,
one will be sorely disappointed.  BASKET CASE 2 may be a lot of things, but
ordinary it is not.  And with that said, please allow the Phantom to discuss a
bit of the film's background so that we may all understand exactly what it is
that he is reviewing.
     In 1982, Frank Henenlotter directed BASKET CASE, a film that in many ways
anticipated Stuart Gordon's later REANIMATOR.  It was a film that was part
horror and part comedy and was done with tongue firmly in cheek.  BASKET CASE
told the story of Siamese twins Duane and Belial (joined at the side), and of
what happens once they're separated.
     Although Duane is of average height and build and looks relatively normal,
his brother Belial stands about 2 feet tall, has arms growing out of the sides
of his head, and has very sharp, pointed teeth.  Actually, he doesn't really
stand at all, since he doesn't have feet in the commonly understood sense of
the word.  So how does he get around?  Well, Duane carries him in a large
wicker basket, which serves the dual purpose of getting Belial around the city
and keeping him hidden from those who might not be as understanding as his
brother.
     Sounds a little out of the ordinary, right?  Phans, Frank Henenlotter has
done some things that would make even Stuart Gordon look away in shame.  This
is the same director who last year brought us BRAIN DAMAGE, an equally bizarre
and offbeat horror/comedy about a man and the parasite who takes control of
him, forcing him to kill innocent people so that he (the parasite) can pop out
and eat their brains.  The parasite looks a bit like a snake with hands and
has, among other things, a marvelous singing voice.  "Offbeat" is clearly
putting it mildly.
     Duane is forcibly separated from his brother by his well-meaning parents
who want only for him to be able to live a normal life, and who think that
having an extra head with arms growing out of his side would at the very least
lessen Duane's chances of getting a date for the prom.  But Belial doesn't want
to be separated from his beloved brother, and neither does Duane, since both
brothers always enjoyed a, shall we say, close relationship, including the
ability to communicate via a form of ESP.  But separated they are, and in
revenge Belial kills the doctors who performed the operation and escapes to New
York City with brother Duane and his wicker basket.
     The Phantom won't give away any more of the original film, but suffice it
to say that things get steadily stranger from there.  You didn't think that was
possible, did you?
     BASKET CASE was notable for being shot on a shoestring budget (the Phantom
thinks it was transferred from 16mm, but he's not sure) and yet not being at
all compromised by a lack of special-effects funds.  It also became an
overnight cult classic in the way that most films become cult classics: by
being very silly, by looking somewhat amateurish, and by being a lot of fun.
     BASKET CASE 2 is, obviously, a sequel to the original.  The story picks up
where the last one left off, with Duane and Belial falling to their (assumed)
deaths from the top floor of a Times Square hotel room.  [Reviewer's note to
his New York City phans: this was before the days of the Marriott Marquis and
other 50-story midtown monstrosities.  Just as well, as no special effects
department in the world could ever design a creature as ugly as the Marquis.]
Do they die?  Well, no spoilers here, phans, but no, they don't.  Surprise!
Just remember, horror personalities never die, they just become Jason-ized, a
process that freezes the characters for a period of one year, or until the
video release of the last episode, whichever comes first.  In this case it just
took a little longer.
     So Duane and Belial are hospitalized, and before long they find themselves
in the home of Granny Ruth, a good-hearted soul whose mission in life is to
give "unique individuals" the privacy and respect they deserve.  By the way,
the Phantom likes that particular euphemism a lot and intends to use it the
next time one of his readers accuses him of holding freakish opinions.  No,
he'll retort, they are *not* freakish.  They're unique.
     Well, Granny has more than just a good heart; she also has an attic full
of what look to be NIGHTBREED extras.  These unique individuals are certainly
unique, but it's a shame that BASKET CASE 2 was released so soon after
NIGHTBREED, since some of the makeup loses its effectiveness that way.  It's
not that the makeup is inferior, it's just that at the moment we horror fans
are suffering from what the Phantom likes to call Jabba-the-Hut syndrome: too
much plot in service of the special effects department (particularly the makeup
department) and not the other way around.
     As expected, things don't stay calm and quiet around Granny's house for
long.  Soon a reporter from the local Enquirer clone ("BABY RAISED BY
HUMMINGBIRDS" reads one of the headlines on the publisher's wall) comes
snooping around, hot on the trail of the fugitive brothers and eager to start
raking in those book, paperback, movie-of-the-week, film, and video residuals.
Aren't we all?
     The Phantom won't go further with his plot synopsis, since the film
proceeds in fairly standard form from there.  So what makes BASKET CASE 2 a cut
above the usual horror fare?  A few things, but most notably the way
Henenlotter handles the age-old story of an individual feeling alone and
freakish, different from everyone else and so isolated from society.  This
film, like its predecessors BASKET CASE and BRAIN DAMAGE has a heart to it --
no matter how absurd things get, at base there's a story that people can relate
to, and it's possible to identify with the characters.  Well, at least Duane,
although there have been those Monday mornings when the Phantom thinks he knows
pretty much how Belial feels as well.
     He also thinks that it would be best if his phans would rent the original
before seeing BASKET CASE 2, since he doesn't believe that they would really
enjoy as much otherwise.  Unlike its predecessor, BASKET CASE 2 is low budget,
but not shoestring budget, and so the unsuspecting might not realize that deep
down it's still a jokey continuation of the original; although the Phantom
greatly enjoyed the film, he doesn't think that it could stand well on its own.
This is true, of course, of many sequels, but the Phantom thinks that it is
especially true of this one -- if you haven't seen the original BASKET CASE,
you might not get all the jokes, and if you don't get all the jokes you won't
enjoy yourself as much as you should.
     But don't be fooled into thinking that BASKET CASE 2 makes no sense on its
own -- it does, and it can certainly be enjoyed apart from the original.
Although the film tends to slow down at points, it is generally well-paced and
-plotted, and the makeup and special effects are used well.  The film's editing
and direction are tight and crisp -- Henenlotter has complete control of this
film from the very beginning, and he has a real flair for making even the most
outrageous of situations seem perfectly plausible.
     One of the most outrageous situations in the film is that of Duane
himself, since he's played by the same actor who portrayed him in the original.
Yet because the sequel begins only moments after the original ends, we're
suddenly confronted with an actor who is obviously in his thirties and who
looks nothing at all like he did when he starred in the original BASKET CASE
eight years ago.  It's a tribute to Henenlotter that Duane's appearance is more
difficult to accept than is Belial's.
     The Phantom was also delighted to see that Frito-Lay products --
especially Doritos -- and Jolt cola are the official snack foods of Duane,
Belial, and other unique individuals.  There are also a lot of Televideo
terminals about, and at times the Phantom actually found himself cringing in
his seat at the thought that someone would -- gasp!  -- use one.  "No!  Lady!
Don't go into that office!  Don't touch that keyboard!"  he found himself
screaming at one point.  The Phantom chalks this up to his own traumatic
experiences with Televideo equipment in his distant past; the reactions of
other viewers may, of course, be different.
     But the Phantom won't hold the blatant product placement against
Henenlotter and the film; after all, one must have some respect for a director
who could convince several major corporations to willingly lend support for a
movie like BASKET CASE 2, which even the Phantom must admit is rather out of
the mainstream.  A long way from Jay Leno to Belial, no?  Suddenly "Crunch all
you want -- we'll make more!" takes on a whole new meaning....
     The sound and music are both above average, and although the
cinematography is fairly standard, there is some interesting and clever camera
work at times.  And surprise of surprises, it ends well.  Imagine, a real
ending -- one that doesn't look like it was an afterthought or a "suggestion"
by the studio.
     What more could one ask for?  The Phantom heartily recommends BASKET CASE
2 -- as in fact he does all of Henenlotter's work -- and thinks that phans who
get in on the joke will enjoy this film more than some of its recent
competition, NIGHTBREED included.
     By the way, for those phans who are now intrigued by Mr. Henenlotter and
are slavering to know more about him, watch for his next film, FRANKENHOOKER,
currently scheduled for spring or summer release.  Previews for this epic were
shown before BASKET CASE 2 (as they're both from Shapiro/Glickenhaus); having
seen the preview and considered the title, the Phantom thinks that Stuart
Gordon is going to have to get cracking, since it appears that Henenlotter has
just upped the ante.

Title
Review for Shocker (1989)
     The Phantom takes some of the blame for the letdown his phans will surely
feel upon leaving SHOCKER; truthfully, he added to the unwarranted hype
surrounding the film by encouraging his readers to save their money for Wes
Craven's latest by avoiding the dismal HALLOWEEN 5 two weeks ago.
     But surely no one could be more disappointed than the Phantom himself, who
has admired Craven since his horror debut -- THE HILLS HAVE EYES -- over a
decade ago, and who has followed his career avidly ever since, from the
original A NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET to THE SERPENT AND THE RAINBOW.  Of course,
there have been some duds along the way (DEADLY BLESSING comes to mind), but
even the ones that weren't standouts were generally a cut above the usual
horror fare.
     Pholks, there's good news and (mostly) bad news with this one.  The good
news is that Craven still makes some of the most interesting horror films
around; the creator of Freddy Kruger and the atmospheric SERPENT has returned
with Horace Pinker, a truly loathsome character who has as much personality as
Freddy, but who spends considerably less time talking and considerably more
time killing.  Horace, you see, is a television repairman with a taste for
murdering people -- whole families, actually -- and although he cracks a joke
now and then, he is to Freddy Kruger what Dolph Lundgren is to Bruce Willis.
     But sadly Craven doesn't seem to know what to do with Horace; during the
first half of the film, Horace is strictly a devil worshiping maniac (actually,
a television worshiping manic, though the Phantom has long believed them to be
one in the same), but as the film progresses, Horace becomes more and more like
Freddy, thus doing himself and his audience no favor at all: if we wanted
Freddy (and after the disappointing NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET 5 it's not clear
that we do any more), we'd head for our local Blockbusters.
     This brings us to the bad news, of which there is plenty.  We'll start
with the plot, although even with his Official Phantom Film Reviewer's Notebook
(R), the Phantom was unable to jot down all of the loose ends, false starts,
missed opportunities, and what looked to be the outcome of a few too many
script conferences with nervous studio executives.  It boils down to this:
quite simply, somewhere along the way someone lost faith in this film.  Someone
decided that audiences don't really want to see horror films that are filled
with horror; instead, they'd rather watch a watered-down "Elm Street" clone.
So a film that begins with a great good many killings (some quite messy indeed)
transforms itself about half way through into an "Elm Street" retread, complete
with the requisite "Is this a dream or isn't it?"  sequences and cut-rate ELM
STREET special effects.
     The plot goes hither and yon, never quite settling down into anything we
can sink our fangs into.  For a while, Horace is a run-of-the-mill mass
murderer.  Yet Our Hero Jonathan Parker can sense him in his dreams (shades of
"Elm Street" here), and even join him as he stalks and kills various family
members in a house miles away.  Why is this?  We never find out, because after
about 30 minutes, Horace is captured by the police and the film comes to a
screeching halt as we wait for Horace to get the chair (though once the action
shifts to the prison, things pick up a bit).  Needless to say, Horace survives
this in one form or another, and the film lurches onward for a while in a
completely different vein.  Then, after another 30 minutes have passed, the
film transforms itself yet again, as Horace finds a way to live on by
inhabiting and using the bodies of those around him.
     This lack of pacing and continuity is one of the biggest problems with
SHOCKER.  As Craven picks up and discards ideas -- how television violence
(especially television news) affects us, a couple of dream sequences, some
possessions, a bit of NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD, a couple of gross-out scenes,
some flirting with the tired "love conquers all" theme -- the film goes all
over the place and ends up nowhere.  Why Craven didn't just start the film with
a brief introduction and then 50,000 volts is a mystery.  Why waste half an
hour on a traditional Hero Chasing Murderous Lunatic plot when it turns out to
be almost entirely irrelevant to the remainder of the film, which is anything
*but* traditional and in fact borders occasionally on the truly weird?
     Along with its continuity problems, SHOCKER also suffers from too many
scenes that misfire -- scenes that may have worked better on paper than they do
in the theater, where they generally had the audience and the Phantom himself
hooting in both laughter and derision.
     And there's still more bad news, phans.  With the exception of Horace, the
characters -- and the actors who portray them -- are uniformly bad, as is the
dialogue (although Horace does get in a few good lines, Freddy-style, toward
the end).  Worst is Jonathan's father, a police lieutenant (more shades of ELM
STREET), who despite overwhelming evidence that something out of the ordinary
is happening steadfastly refuses to believe that Horace isn't just your garden
variety, fully human, non-electrified lunatic.  True, most horror films are
filled with people who wander innocently down basement steps or say "There must
be a logical explanation for all this" without cracking a smile, but the
lieutenant truly tries our patience and makes nearly every one of his scenes an
agony of bad acting, bad delivery, and bad scripting.  The same can be said of
Jonathan's girlfriend Alison; after taking leave of the movie early on, she
returns later to appear in some of the most awful scenes in the film, during
which time the audience prayed fervently, repeatedly, and vocally for her
timely death.
     Lest the Phantom make SHOCKER out to be a complete disappointment, he will
say that although it doesn't always succeed in its goals; although it misses
too many payoffs; and although it loses its way -- and its audience -- about
half way through, SHOCKER remains one of the year's better horror films.  In a
year that brought us nothing new from Clive Barker or Stuart Gordon, and with
only the unrelentingly stupid PET SEMATARY and a smattering of warmed-over
horror sequels to compare it to, SHOCKER is worth seeing.  Certainly it's worth
2 stars, and it's certainly more entertaining than the rather tedious HALLOWEEN
5, which is it's only competition at the moment.
     See it for its top-notch camera work and for the way Craven can set up a
scene, be it a FRIDAY THE 13TH-like attack in a bathroom or a NIGHT OF THE
LIVING DEAD-like chase through a park.  See it for an original and entertaining
new horror personality, though one who won't have his own 900 number,
television series, or merchandising blitz this Halloween because despite the
occasional wisecrack, he is just too loathsome, too vicious, and too cruel to
attract the mass-market audience that Freddy can.  And see it because it will
most likely be a long, cold winter before we get another horror film that's
substantially better.  For all it's flaws, SHOCKER is mostly fun, and if you
don't mind the lumbering plot, it's almost never boring.
     So go, phans, but keep your expectations in check and your hopes among the
popcorn littering the theater's floor.  Don't expect a film as original or as
well executed as the the first "Elm Street," but if your nature is more
forgiving than The Phantom's, you might find it quite enjoyable.

Title
Review for Halloween 5: The Revenge of Michael Myers (1989)
HALLOWEEN 5: THE REVENGE OF MICHAEL MYERS
     You know going into any film with a numeral in the title that you're bound
to be a little disappointed, but the Phantom was a bit surprised at what a
state the "Halloween" series is in.  Certainly he believed that the awful
HALLOWEEN 3: SEASON OF THE WITCH should have killed the series once and for
all, and that if the irrelevant and boring Silver Shamrock shenanigans in that
film didn't do it, then the mechanical, clockwork Jasonized killings of
HALLOWEEN 4: THE RETURN OF MICHAEL MYERS would be the final nail in the
series' coffin.  The fact that more people were involved in the making of these
films than attended them should have helped the series' timely demise.
     But no, it seems that neither Michael nor Mustapha (Akaad, the series'
producer now that John Carpenter is long gone) can be stopped.  And yet the
Phantom finds that he himself can't stop going; he was hooked at the tender age
of 14 and has made it a lifelong habit.  He faithfully attends opening night
showings of even the most horrible horror film, in the hope that *this* one
will be an unexpected pleasure, this year's HELLRAISER or EVIL DEAD.  But
HALLOWEEN 5 raises no hell, and it's a toss-up as to what's more dead about the
film: the plot, the script, or Donald Pleasence's performance.
     If by now you get the feeling that the Phantom was less than satisfied
with the latest "Halloween," well, you're right.  But the film has it's good
points, and although they aren't enough to salvage the film, they do make
watching it a little more enjoyable (or at least tolerable).
     The camera work and cinematography are good and inventive (as they were in
HALLOWEEN 4).  Although there are far too many false alarms, most of Michael's
scenes are well set up; unlike the "Friday the 13th" series, wherein people are
dispatched left and right by an all but unseen Jason, the "Halloween" series
has always had Michael skulk around a bit before getting down to business.
This adds greatly to the suspense, and some of the scenes in HALLOWEEN 5 are
done with nearly as much flair as the original HALLOWEEN.  The opening credits
are also very nicely done; it's a shame that no one spent as much time on the
rest of the film as was spent on its first 90 seconds.
     But the film (and the series) looks tired; the producers are just going
through the motions now, hoping to spend as little as possible on each film and
just enough on advertising to promote sufficient video sales and rentals to
turn a profit.  Worse, the film has one of the most bogus endings of any in
recent memory.  To those concerned with spoilers, let me just say that there's
a tall man dressed in black who steps off a bus mid way through the film and
that he doesn't help matters any.  To anyone planning to see HALLOWEEN 5, the
Phantom strongly recommends getting up and leaving the theater just before the
final scene; you'll be glad you did.  If you hang around the concession stand,
you'll be able to hear clearly the audience's collective reaction to the scene
you missed, aptly summarized by a greatly underaged boy in the audience: "Aw
man, that's bullsh*t."
     If it weren't for that final scene, the Phantom would have given HALLOWEEN
5 a star and half (out of 4), but Michael sends us all home with such an air of
disappointment that 1 star is all it deserves.
     Better to wait for this one to hit your local Blockbusters and save your
money for SHOCKER, Wes Craven's latest due out a few days before Halloween.
This one looks very good; it looks like Craven is trying to recreate the
success he had with the original A NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET.  And since
NIGHTMARE 5 was so disappointing, the Phantom is glad that Craven is coming
back to remind us all how good a horror film can be.
     Also on the horizon is Robert Englund in PHANTOM OF THE OPERA (the ads for
which prominently display a disclaimer to the effect that the film is not based
upon any previous "Phantom of the Opera" film, stage show, or book); it's due
out a week after SHOCKER, but it doesn't look nearly as promising, not the
least because Menachem Golan, half of the now defunct Cannon Films, is
associated with the film.
     The Phantom will be back in a couple of weeks with reviews for both.
Until then, he welcomes Phan mail from anyone interested in the, shall we say,
non-mainstream films he so loves.

Title
Review for Child's Play 3 (1991)
     We start this review first with an apology: to those phans who
despaired of seeing the Phantom's review of CHILD'S PLAY 3 and went to
see it over Labor Day weekend, the Phantom apologizes most sincerely.
In this case, patience would have been its own reward, for there were no
rewards to be found this weekend inside movie houses showing CHILD'S
PLAY 3.
     Though he usually attempts to see a film he is reviewing on opening
day, in this case the Phantom waited until after the holiday so that he
could see Chucky's latest with a friend and phan from the Phantom's day
job (writing sporadic film reviews on the Internet pays less well than
one might expect).  The Phantom intends to see the latest ELM STREET
film on opening day, but he expects that his friend will be making other
plans; having once suffered through 90 minutes of boredom and mental
anguish at the Phantom's behest, he is not likely to make the same
mistake again.  The Phantom feels that his film recommendations likely
carry very little weight or credibility after CHILD'S PLAY 3; though he
warned his friend that the film would no doubt be fairly poor (it being
a sequel to a sequel), he neglected to note that it could -- conceivably
-- be one of the worst horror films ever made.
     And that it is.  Phans who remember the Phantom's review of CHILD'S
PLAY 2 (released about nine months ago) will remember that although the
Phantom was somewhat disappointed with the first sequel to Tom Holland's
1988 horror classic, he found it a cut above the usual slash and trash
fare.  It was stylish and full of good humor, and although Chucky had
become thoroughly Jasonized, phans who didn't go expecting great
originality or an excess of logic found an entertaining and well-made
thriller.
     CHILD'S PLAY 3, however, is a different story entirely.  Actually,
it's exactly the same story, as far as the plot goes, but the result
brought to mind one of the Phantom's tried and true capsule reviews, one
that he uses whenever he wishes to sum up great disappointment tempered
with relief that the proceedings were no worse than they were: At least
there were no locusts.
     Astute phans will recognize at once the reference: bad horror and
locusts can only mean EXORCIST II: THE HERETIC, which remains the
absolute nadir of American horror cinema -- perhaps of American cinema
in general.  If the horror film is a slug inching its way through the
garden of legitimate cinema, EXORCIST II is its slimy trail.  [Phans who
wish to read the definitive review of this turkey should obtain a copy
of "The Golden Turkey Awards", by Harry and Michael Medved -- ISBN
0-399-50463-X -- a delightful compendium of the worst films ever to be
shown on the silver screen.]  Ever since seeing that John Boorman bomb,
the Phantom has been able to reflect on even the most egregiously awful
horror film and think, "Well, at least there were no locusts."  That
thought always brightened the Phantom's mood; all right, so the plot was
predictable, the special effects weren't so special, the acting was
overwrought, and the dialogue was unspeakable.  All right -- but at
least there were no locusts.  No locusts, no Linda Blair, and no James
Earl Jones in a bug suit.  But most especially, no locusts.
     Phans, after about 20 minutes of CHILD'S PLAY 3, the Phantom found
himself desperately trying to remember Linda Blair's classic "dance of
the locusts"; a swarm, a plague, a blizzard -- even James Earl Jones in
his bug suit -- *anything* would have been better than the next 70
minutes of this cinematic travesty.  Alas, nothing flew through the
auditorium but the Phantom's half-eaten popcorn, and the only buzzing
came from the projection booth, whence the projectionist quickly fled
after starting the sorry proceedings.  Had the Phantom not just invested
a small fortune at the box office, and had he not been with his (now
likely former) friend, he too might well have fled, thus elevating
CHILD'S PLAY 3 to the ranks of films so appalling that even the Phantom
himself -- hardened though he is to the genre of the cheaply and
cynically made exploitation film -- was reduced to taking flight from
his aisle seat before he either lost his mind or died of boredom.
     There are more than a few things wrong with CHILD'S PLAY 3, and
lack of locusts is the least of them.  Perhaps it would be better to
catalog what is *right* with the film, since that list would certainly
be shorter, and the Phantom always endeavors to keep his reviews under
2,000 words.  To catalog what is wrong with CHILD'S PLAY 3, even 20,000
words might not do, so its best to start on the high side and work our
way all too quickly to the low.
     In the three years since the original CHILD'S PLAY was released,
Chucky's puppeteers and special effects crew have certainly done
themselves proud; there is no doubt that the Chucky who appears in this
sequel is more life-like and convincing than ever.  He has now been
given a wide range of facial expressions, and this time out we even get
to see his hands move and his fingers wiggle.  Not bad for a doll that's
been burnt up, blown up, torn apart and melted to a heap of molten latex
not once but twice so far in his very brief life.
     In keeping with his new, life-like look, Chucky has also been given
some new, life-like dialogue, all of which sounds like it was cribbed
from FREDDY'S OUTTAKES: HENNY YOUNGMAN IN HELL.  The dialogue --
especially Chucky's dialogue -- is problem number one with the film (as
you can see, the Phantom has already ended his brief catalog of "high
points"; we're now headed down a steep and bottomless incline toward the
"low points").  For some reason, Brad Dourif (the voice of Chucky) seems
to have been given the go-ahead to do his (fairly poor) Jack Nicholson
impersonation throughout the film.  Although Chucky was made into a bit
of a wise-ass in CHILD'S PLAY 2, in his latest outing he's so full of
one-liners that the Phantom thought he might just have come from a
screen test for TERMINATOR 3 -- his only liabilities being his size and
the fact that he's more life-like than Arnold Schwarzenegger.  When he's
not making bad jokes, he's cursing, a sure sign that the writer spent
more time pondering royalties and residuals than he did Roget's.  At one
point the impersonation is so obvious, and the dialogue is so
Nicholson-esque, that Chucky even raises his left eyebrow while
delivering the line.  Had the Phantom not already been shocked into a
stunned silence by the sheer weight of the film's mediocrity, he might
even have laughed; as it was, he merely winced at the sight of a film
that had even at such an early stage gone so far awry.
     The story is worse by far than you are likely to be able to
imagine.  Perhaps your imagination is better than the Phantom's, but he
simply was not ready for CHILD'S PLAY 3's horrific plot.  It's almost as
if Don Mancini, while pondering his probable share of the box office
gross, watched videotapes of GRADUATION DAY, PROM NIGHT, and MY BLOODY
VALENTINE.  The result?  Andy (the unfortunate child who gets Chucky as
a present in the original film and then must deal with him all over
again in the sequel) is now a teenager and is attending a military
academy.  Meanwhile, Chucky is resurrected in some way off-screen,
presumably so that we're spared the pathetic and unlikely explanation --
a "high-point" the Phantom nearly overlooked.  He quickly discovers
Andy's location and wraps himself in a package, places an address label
and correct postage on the outside of the package (from inside the
package, one must assume), and mails himself to the academy.  This is,
in fact, what Mr.  Mancini would have us believe, since in one scene
Chucky is at the Good Guys toy factory, and in the next someone is
unwrapping his package after the postman delivers him -- the package
being the only thing about this film that's first-class.  The absolute
cynicism of this "plot twist" oozes from the screen and puddles on the
auditorium floor along with the soda spilled during the previous show;
in CHILD'S PLAY 3, not only does logic get tossed out the window, but it
takes common sense and all respect for the audience down to the pavement
with it.  Mancini's script for the first CHILD'S PLAY was clever and
original; his script for the sequel was clever enough and filled with
good humor; but his script for CHILD'S PLAY 3 is marked by a terrible
contempt for the audience: even when it makes sense -- which happens all
too infrequently -- it assumes that those of us who were unfortunate
enough to get suckered into seeing CHILD'S PLAY 3 also deserve to be
laughed at by the filmmakers.  Perhaps, however, the last laugh will be
ours; though the film has only been in release for a few days, at the
Phantom's showing the theater staff already well outnumbered the
unfortunate patrons.
     Need the Phantom go on?  CHILD'S PLAY 3 is a film that we've all
seen before: its plot is so creaky that the Phantom had hoped it had
been retired forever after having all but killed the horror film in the
early eighties.  Pick any plot from your least favorite horror film,
phans, and you've pretty much got it: Teenager knows terrible secret;
teenager acts alone; teenager enlists friends; some friends die; final
confrontation; lunatic killer goes to his reward; audience files out
disgusted and discovers once again why God created VHS.
     Since Andy is a teenager, it's difficult to see why he should be so
frightened of what is, after all, a two-foot-tall doll.  True, the doll
is going after another little kid (the film's token black actor, and the
only person who seems to be enjoying himself on screen), and true, along
the way he does manage to kill a couple of peripheral characters, but
when it comes right down to it, Andy looks tired and more than a little
bored.  He's been through all this before, and we've been there with
him.  Since Chucky's attention is for some mysterious reason split
between Andy and the little kid who unwraps him, there is no opportunity
for any sustained suspense, or even for a prolonged chase scene.  The
awful plot intrudes at every juncture, and just when things look like
they might start to get interesting, we're treated to another ten
minutes of the worst homage to FULL METAL JACKET that has ever been
made.  Remind you of GRADUATION DAY?  PROM NIGHT, perhaps?
     The film winds itself down at a leisurely pace -- the filmmakers
apparently assumed that simply showing Chucky on the screen once every
few minutes and having him say something either inane, vulgar, or both
would be enough; or at the very least, that we as loyal phans of the
series deserve no more.  Having eluded his pursuers and escaped
capturing our interest for nearly an hour and a half, Chucky follows his
potential victim to a nearby carnival (isn't there a carnival near every
military academy?), and for the third (fourth?)  and last time begins
the lengthy pseudo-Latin prayer to the gods of the underworld that he be
released from his tiny latex prison, and that his soul be allowed to
rush into the body of the unfortunate (but patient) little kid who's
with him.
     As Chucky's lengthy liturgy droned on, the Phantom prayed fervently
to the twin gods of pay TV and enhanced downstream value that the film
would be no more than a cable-friendly 90 minutes in length, so that he
himself could rush out of the auditorium and scan the skies for signs of
locusts.  No locusts, alas, but in truth, one plague each day is enough.
And after seeing CHILD'S PLAY 3, it is the Phantom's sincere belief that
enough is most definitely enough.  CHILD'S PLAY 3 is a repellent film,
one that holds its audience in near constant contempt, and one that is
so cynically and incompetently made that it makes even Freddy's death
knell -- THE DREAM CHILD -- seem enjoyable by comparison.  Even HARDWARE
was so bad that it was nearly funny; CHILD'S PLAY 3 is just bad.
     Here's wishing a plague of locusts on Don Mancini for concocting
it, and on Universal for releasing it.  The Phantom will leave it to
them to find Linda Blair and have her do her locust dance so that they
may be released from the curse of unanimous audience disdain -- a curse
more terrible for a Hollywood studio than any swarm of insects could
ever be.

Title
Review for Nightbreed (1990)
(The Phantom is going to back into this review of NIGHTBREED by first covering
a little of Clive Barker's cinematic history.  Those phans who have no patience
for the Phantom's history lesson can fast-forward to the good parts a few
paragraphs down.  But note well that the Phantom will be very, very
disappointed in you if you do.  And you don't want that, now do you?)
     The Phantom believes he can best discuss NIGHTBREED in the context of
Barker's other work, including his two previous cinematic efforts, HELLRAISER
and its sequel HELLBOUND: HELLRAISER II.  Although NIGHTBREED stands as a
horror film in its own right, any true fan of Barker's work must, of necessity,
compare it to what else he has brought us over the past three years, and see
how it is both better and worse than its worthy predecessors.  That said, a bit
of history:
     Ever since HELLRAISER's 1987 debut, the Phantom has heard rumors that the
reason it was so good, so stylish, and so scary had little to do with Clive
Barker's skill as a director.  Rather, though the story and characters sprang
from Barker's fertile imagination, the film itself was taken out of Barker's
hands once he demonstrated a distinct lack of skill in bringing HELLRAISER in
on time and on budget.
     So the person who finished the film and made it one of the classic films
of the genre was not Barker at all, but instead was Tony Randel, none other
than the director of HELLRAISER's sequel, HELLBOUND: HELLRAISER II.  Throughout
both films one can see Barker's characters, hear his dialogue, and relish his
inventive story lines.  But it is Randel who is responsible for the look, the
pacing, the editing, and the camera work of the films in the HELLRAISER series;
it is he, not Barker, who is responsible for making those films what they are.
     Now, the Phantom must caution that this is only rumor; he has never had it
either confirmed or denied (though he *has* heard if from more then one
source).  And though it is circumstantial evidence at best, he would direct
doubting phans to notice the look of both films: for films made by different
directors, they look startlingly alike.  The Phantom can't think of another
pair of films, directed by different people, that so closely resemble each
other -- though he can, of course, think of many pairs that look entirely
different: the two BEVERLY HILLS COP films, for example.
     That said, we arrive at NIGHTBREED, Barker's latest film, and one which he
both directed and adapted from his recent novel, CABAL.  And in keeping with
the Phantom's theories about the creative force behind Barker's two previous
films, NIGHTBREED looks and feels nothing like them.  That is a shame, since
the Phantom thinks that whatever their pluses and minuses, both of the films in
the HELLRAISER series are stylish and visually compelling, well edited and
directed, and very, very effective.  He would also like to say the same of
NIGHTBREED, but alas, he cannot.
     NIGHTBREED feels choppy and poorly constructed -- almost as if much more
than its running time of about 100 minutes was filmed but then ultimately left
on the cutting room floor.  It suffers to a great degree from "DUNE-itis", an
illness that affects nearly all films based on novels.  This means that
NIGHTBREED will present problems for two kinds of moviegoers: those who have
read CABAL, and those who haven't.  While the former will be disappointed in
the way large sections of the story have been eliminated from or glossed over
in the film, at least they won't be as confused as the latter.  The Phantom
suspects that Caryn James of the New York Times is a member of the latter
group, since in her review of NIGHTBREED she called the film "a huge yawn of a
movie."  To the Phantom, this demonstrates that Ms. James might perhaps be
more comfortable reviewing films in other genres, or other media altogether,
since although NIGHTBREED has more than a few weaknesses, "a huge yawn of a
movie" it most certainly is not.
     Yet the Phantom can understand what Ms. James's problem might have been:
without having read CABAL, much of NIGHTBREED really doesn't make much sense.
People do and say things for no reason or for reasons that are never explained;
the psychiatrist Decker slips in and out of his Mask at random or convenient
times and kills for reasons Barker keeps to himself; and Midian itself comes
across as little more than an underground Sheraton convention center for the
dead, even though in CABAL Barker presented it as the strange and frightening
home of the last of the shapeshifters -- a species neither living nor dead, but
certainly more than just a bunch of monsters sitting around talking.
     But those who have read CABAL may not enjoy NIGHTBREED much more than
Ms. James, if only because knowing what to expect so diminishes the film's few
surprises.  And without the wonderful interior monologues of characters like
The Mask, NIGHTBREED is reduced to relating, in a perfectly straightforward and
sequential manner, CABAL's basic plot -- one that even the most ardent of
Barker's fans would have to agree is pretty thin.
     To his credit, Barker admirably does refrain from "embellishing"
NIGHTBREED with a constant stream of voice-overs in an attempt to explain
what's going on; in this way, at least, NIGHTBREED escapes from the full
effects of DUNE-itis.
     And just for the sake of completeness, the Phantom will add that
NIGHTBREED contains some truly awful dialogue.  But unfortunately that should
not come as much of a surprise to any fan of the genre.
     "So the Phantom didn't like this one?" you ask.  Not so fast; remember,
just because he has taken pains to explain a film's bad points doesn't mean
that the Phantom didn't have a great time while he was watching it.  And truth
be known, once the Phantom realized that NIGHTBREED really wasn't in the same
class as the films in the HELLRAISER series, he enjoyed himself immensely.  As
a horror film wholly apart from Barker's previous efforts, NIGHTBREED is, on
the whole, a resounding success and a heck of a lot of fun.  (Please excuse the
MPAA-unrated cuss word in the last sentence.)
     Let's hit the film's high points: First, there's David Cronenberg's (yes,
*that* David Cronenberg) characterization of the psychiatrist Decker, and his
alter ego, The Mask.  Cronenberg turns in a truly chilling performance, one
nearly good enough for a starring role in DEAD RINGERS II.  In fact,
Cronenberg's was one of the film's two good performances (the other was that of
the ex-Hill Street Blues actor Charles Haid -- Renko -- who played sheriff
Eigerman), and he's in enough of the scenes to allow one to overlook the film's
other, less than award-winning, performances.
     The special effects -- especially the creature effects -- are outstanding,
and there's also enough gore to satisfy all but the most hard-core of Barker's
fans.  Slash-and-trash fans should be just as happy as the rubber mask set,
since there are equal amounts of each.  In fact, throughout NIGHTBREED there's
almost always something to keep one amused and interested in the proceedings,
and it's only rarely that one becomes aware of the inherent silliness of the
plot and some of the dialogue.
     The film's sound effects and music are fairly good, although the Phantom
doesn't think that the score ranks up there with Danny Elfman's best work; he
seems to have done better by BATMAN and THE SIMPSONS than by Barker.
NIGHTBREED also seems to have been filmed in Dolby Surround, a nice surprise
(or perhaps the standard Dolby stereo work was just above average; it's
sometimes difficult to tell in the sleazepit theaters the Phantom frequents).
     As the Phantom has pointed out, the editing and direction leave something
to be desired, and one must certainly overlook the plot holes if one is going
to enjoy oneself.  But that's a given with almost any film in the genre, and to
his credit Barker has made sure that however silly things get, NIGHTBREED
remains internally consistent, and that although logic may occasionally be
challenged, it is never overtly defied.  Assuming that an underground community
of shapeshifting cannibals doesn't defy logic -- and for the life of him, the
Phantom cannot imagine why it should.
     So all in all, NIGHTBREED is a success, and well worth seeing before it
takes its leave of the silver screen and arrives on video in a few months.
Although not in the same league as Barker's HELLRAISER series, NIGHTBREED is a
quality horror film that never fails to entertain -- even when it does
occasionally fail to make a whole lot of sense.

Title
Review for Flatliners (1990)
     It's been a long, tedious, and violence-prone summer for the
Phantom, and he's been getting a little edgy.  Reviewing's in his blood
now, and it's been nearly three months since his last reviews (for CLASS
OF 1999 and BRAIN DEAD).
     Since then, he's been subjected to more violence thinly disguised
as pop entertainment than even Steven King, in his wildest dreams,
possibly could have imagined.  The combined body counts of TOTAL RECALL,
ROBOCOP 2, DIE HARD 2, and PRESUMED INNOCENT (well, to be fair, PRESUMED
INNOCENT's body count *was* on the low side) exceeded even the Phantom's
threshold for violence sometime in mid-July; for him, the cold, dark
days of autumn and winter, and the dozens of horror films they'll bring,
will seem like welcome relief indeed.
     Which brings us, in a rather roundabout way, to the subject of this
review.  For a film that is ostensibly about dying, it's curious that no
one dies in FLATLINERS -- at least not for long.  Although the film is
as much of a horror film as was THE OMEN and THE EXORCIST, FLATLINERS
ties PRESUMED INNOCENT as the summer's film with the lowest body count.
     (Before the Phantom even gets started reviewing the film, he would
like to say that he finds this both remarkable and quite refreshing; it
wasn't too long ago that filmmakers knew how to make films, both horror
and legitimate, in ways that didn't involve killing more people on
screen than they disappointed in the auditorium.)
     FLATLINERS starts with the tired old notion of "near death"
experiences, takes a detour somewhere around ELM STREET, and winds up as
a visual homage to one of the most stylish horror films of all time: THE
HUNGER.  Along the way, the director, Joel Schumacher, reminds us of
just what made 1987's THE LOST BOYS so enjoyable, and why he is one of
the best and most stylish directors making B-grade movies today.
     The film itself is best described as a rollercoaster ride -- a lot
of fun while you're speeding around turns and checking your seat
restraints, but not very memorable afterward.  To its credit, the film
makes believable the shaky notion that a bunch of photogenic medical
students with no homework, labwork, and just the occasional round to
make, can repeatedly induce brain death in each other for periods of
time greater even than the length of the commercials preceding the film,
and then unfailingly resuscitate each other, bringing each other back to
life and suffering no more brain damage than has the script.
     Having established that, which is no mean feat, Schumacher uses the
near death experiences to fashion a film that blends the best of the ELM
STREET series with the sensibility of a 90-minute MTV longform video.
Yet regardless of what you think of the subject matter, or even of the
film itself, there is no denying that Schumacher's cinematography, his
ability to set a scene and generate suspense, and his ability to use
sound effects and lighting techniques effectively is virtually unequaled
in the world of the horror film.  Sam Raimi and the Coen brothers have
shown the same skill with the EVIL DEAD series, BLOOD SIMPLE and RAISING
ARIZONA, and of course Ridley Scott's films define the genre of
techno-style, but Schumacher's talents have improved in the years since
THE LOST BOYS, and at this point the Phantom has to rank him right up
there with Sam, Joel, and Ethan.
     Schumacher keeps the film moving along, and it's good that he does,
since otherwise the audience would have time to consider just how trite
and obvious the plot is.  The Phantom is not going to drop any spoilers,
but if there is a single phan out there who can't guess both where the
film is going and how it ends by the time Kevin Bacon goes under, the
Phantom will be most surprised.  THE LOST BOYS suffered from similar
problems, of course; as modern-day vampire stories go, it doesn't hold a
silver bullet to NEAR DARK.  But at least THE LOST BOYS had interesting
characters, generally witty dialogue, and a script that doesn't sound as
if the closest it ever came to a second draft was when the writer left
some of the windows in his apartment open.  To say that the characters
in FLATLINERS are two-dimensional would be to insult the Cartesian
coordinate system; they each have one dimension, and they each stick to
that dimension throughout the film.  Kiefer Sutherland is the driven,
slightly bad guy; Kevin Bacon is the brilliant, unstable yet reliable
guy, Julia Roberts keeps us all waiting for the scene where they perform
CPR on her and in general never allows the word "collagen" to leave our
thoughts, etc., etc.
     But we don't go to horror films expecting great originality, do we
phans?  Although the occasional diamond in the rough like the EVIL DEAD
series or last spring's BRAIN DEAD helps us recall that it is possible
to be both creative and stylish, all too frequently we are forced to
settle for films that are neither.  That FLATLINERS is so very stylish
is a distinct plus, and Schumacher handles the film so well that the
Phantom was more than willing to overlook the bumpy plot and the less
than surprising surprises.
     The film is set in Chicago, but only barely.  As he did with THE
LOST BOYS, Schumacher has used various unrelated sets and city backdrops
in a way that creates a private world for the film; FLATLINERS is not
set in any recognizable part or suburb of Chicago, though alumni of
Loyola may recognize some of the more striking buildings in the film.
But for the most part, the characters in FLATLINERS exist in their own
world, a world of colored lights, fog, and the night (it's almost always
night during the film, and when it isn't night it's dark or cloudy).
Phans of THE LOST BOYS will recognize some of Schumacher's signature
elements of style, but FLATLINERS has many of its own; it is obviously
related to THE LOST BOYS, but it doesn't look like a clone.  One
interesting new affectation is having large sheets of clear plastic
draped over almost everything in sight; this was done to such excess
that the Phantom thought that all of Chicago was undergoing massive
asbestos removal procedures.  And Schumacher's swooping and diving
camera is back, but his technique has improved in the years since THE
LOST BOYS.  In FLATLINERS, he makes use of all the tricks of the music
video trade, including black & white photography, purposely grainy or
flat photography, washed out or oversaturated color, etc.  There are
also a good number of monitors of various kinds scattered throughout the
film, and Schumacher even cribs a bit from SEX, LIES AND VIDEOTAPE.  For
better or worse (and the in the Phantom's opinion, better), FLATLINERS
plays more like a longform video than like a film.
     By the film's end, the Phantom was reminded of Tony Scott's 1983
film, THE HUNGER, a vampire film that was exquisitely bad, though very,
very stylish.  Schumacher is not a talentless hack like Scott;
FLATLINERS is nothing if not entertaining.  Whereas THE HUNGER was a
feast for the eyes and a famine for the mind, FLATLINERS keeps us
entertained and happy as long as we don't spend too much time trying to
predict the outcome of the next scene (or even what the next scene will
be) -- for alas, all too often we are correct and left to wonder why
someone didn't put as much effort into the story as Schumacher had
obviously put into filming it.
     And it's at the end, when things start winding down and heading
toward their all-too-predictable conclusion, that the Phantom found his
interest in the film flatlining (or at least faultering).  FLATLINERS is
a good 10 minutes too long, and the ending is so disappointing that it
stands a good chance of ruining what is otherwise a very entertaining,
if brainless, film for those phans who expected to see a horror film
that had the courage of its convictions.
     The ending, phans, is an ending only a studio executive or a parent
could love; it is a near-perfect mass-market movie-of-the-week ending.
The Phantom even felt that it gave THE ABYSS a run for its money as the
world's most abysmal ending, but in the end his conclusion is that THE
ABYSS is still reigning champion.  Things start going astray once it
becomes obvious that the film has a GHOST-like heart to it; all the
malevolence, chills and thrills of the first half start to disappear
like a vampire exposed to daylight, and the audience is left with 20
minutes of pointless exposition that leads inexorably to a conclusion
worthy only of our strongest excoriation.  (All right, perhaps that was
reaching a bit, but the Phantom hasn't visited his old friend Roget in
quite a while.)  In a word, phans, the ending is execrable.  (Now *that*
was reaching...)
     But don't let the lousy ending keep you from seeing FLATLINERS;
after all, if the Phantom avoided every film that ended badly, he'd be
able to get his library books back on time and he'd rarely have to clean
the heads on his VCR.  Like THE LOST BOYS, FLATLINERS is wonderful fun
while you're in the theater, and though you will most likely be groaning
along with the rest of the audience by the film's end, you won't be
bored for the 90 minutes preceding it.

Title
Review for Halloween 5: The Revenge of Michael Myers (1989)
     The Phantom has had some requests for a plot synopsis for HALLOWEEN 5.
Normally, he just reviews films and leaves the spoilers to Siskel and Ebert,
but since he's always eager to accommodate his phans, here's a brief outline.
     When we last left Michael, he was at the bottom of a big hole in the
ground, having been shot 20 or 30 times by the local law.  But is he dead?
Well, even the second-graders sitting near the Phantom Friday night knew
Michael wasn't *really* dead.  After seeing 5 minutes of HALLOWEEN 4 to set up
the scene (a formula stolen from the "Friday the 13th" series, wherein for each
F, where F is the current film, the first five minutes of F are equal to the
last five minutes of (F - 1)), we see that he escapes, only to return to
attempt to kill his niece Jamie (who is now institutionalized after having
killed her stepmother at the end of HALLOWEEN 4) and everyone around her.
     Jamie spends most of the first half of the film in bed, unable to speak
because of the trauma she suffered at the hands of Michael (it was he who made
her kill her stepmom -- that's of course how we should all have known he was
still alive).  Donald Pleasence is still around, too, looking much the worse
for wear.  He implores Jamie to help him stop Michael, but she refuses, and
instead writes things like "He's coming" on her blackboard and generally acts
thoroughly possessed.  Why won't Jamie help the good doctor?  Well, as it turns
out, she still has mixed feelings about her uncle; after all, even though he's
a quasi-human mass murderer, he's still family.  But this doesn't come out
until the end of the film, after any sort of plot subtleties have been long
forgotten.
     During the course of the first half to two-thirds of the film, Michael
manages to dispatch a half-dozen random people, mostly friends of Jamie's
sister (who he also gets).  Jamie's sister is notable for spending about five
minutes in and out of a shower and a towel, but the Phantom was disappointed to
note that there's no almost no nudity in the film at all.  Indeed, there's very
little gore, either, although the lack of nudity surprised the Phantom since
although gore costs money, nudity is free.  After the five-minute tease, she's
quickly dispatched, and it's on to the next.
     Jamie still has a telepathic link of some sort with Michael, still sees
his murders, and even directs the police to a gas station in time to save
Jamie's sister's friend from Michael's unkind hands.  But it's not until the
film is almost over that she agrees to help trap Michael so that he can be
killed once and for all.
     Meanwhile, we are treated to glimpses of a tall stranger dressed all in
black who wears cowboy boots.  He steps off a bus about half way through the
film, and reappears every now and then, but he really has nothing at all to do
with the proceedings until the very end.  But we all see that he has the same
tattoo on his wrist as Michael has on his wrist.
     Things wind up at a farm somewhere, which allows the film to rehash the
barn scene from FRIDAY THE 13TH PART 2 (possibly 3, although the Phantom is
still recovering from his 3-D induced headache).  In any case, it's not nearly
as good, but it does give the film an excuse to waste an inordinate amount of
time on false alarms and to show us two youngsters getting ready for a roll in
the hay (but again, sorry guys, there's nothing to see).
     Finally everyone who isn't already dead winds up in the meadow and the
doctor implores Michael to go home, because only there will he be able to rid
himself of his rage (a gratuitous New Age touch).  At this point in the film,
going home was indeed on the Phantom's mind, but he stuck it out to the bitter
end.
     The cast reconvenes at the place where it all began, and everyone hunkers
down to wait for Michael to come and try to kill his niece (she's the bait, of
course).  The whole police force is there, although it doesn't occur to anyone
that guns haven't had a great effect on Michael in the past 12 years, and that
they're unlikely to have any effect now that we're into the third sequel.
Michael arrives eventually, kills some cops, beats up Pleasence (a smattering
of applause was heard for that), and goes after Jamie.  The hide and seek
scenes with Jamie are fairly well done and by the end, when Jamie is trapped in
the attic, we see the results of Michael's carnage, displayed artfully around
the room.  Jamie is forced into a coffin (one Michael dug up especially for
her), and just when Michael is about to kill her he's stopped by her cry of
"Uncle!"  Well, the Phantom thought it was funny, even if it went over the
heads of the second-graders in the audience.
     Jamie asks that she be allowed to see his face, and she does, but alas, we
don't.  We do see that Michael has black hair, and that he's a sensitive guy,
since he sheds a tear when Jamie says, "We're just the same."
     But of course they're not, since Jamie is a nine-year-old girl and Michael
is knife-wielding maniac; once he realizes this he gets back down to business
and the chase continues.
     Jamie escapes, and Michael is finally tricked by the still-not-dead
Pleasence and is, incredibly, taken into custody and put into a cell.
     Phans, if you *do* see this movie, even against the Phantom's best advice,
please leave the auditorium or switch off your VCR at this point.  It's best
just to assume that Michael will be back next year and not to worry too much
how.
     What happens is that the mysterious stranger in the cowboy boots walks
into the jail and shoots all the cops Terminator-style (we see only the
aftermath, alas), and springs Michael.
     But truthfully, the Phantom's rating of 1 star still stands, no matter how
bad he's made the film seem here.  HALLOWEEN 5, for all its faults is better
than the last couple of "Friday the 13th"s, although this certainly isn't
saying much...

Title
Review for Warlock (1989)
     Surprise of surprises, WARLOCK was actually released -- to a paying
audience -- in New York City, the place the Phantom calls home.  This
caught the Phantom somewhat off-guard, as he expected that WARLOCK would
suffer a fate similar to that of BRIDE OF REANIMATOR, which is even now
shocking unsuspecting parents of the twelve-year-olds who are renting it
in droves from Blockbusters across the country.  The long-awaited sequel
to the cult classic REANIMATOR got either no theatrical release, or such
a limited run that it made no difference; for all intents and purposes,
the film went straight from the mind of Stuart Gorden to a half-dozen
video duplicators across the country.
     Such things depress the Phantom, for he knows that there is a
market for horror out there, if only the independent production
companies responsible for most of it could muscle their way into our
increasingly monopolized theater chains.  Getting an independent film
into movie houses is no mean feat these days, even -- or perhaps
especially -- in New York, which has been neatly divvied up by
MCA/Universal on one hand and Loews/Paramount on the other.  These days,
some films are playing everywhere, and some almost nowhere, and never
does it have anything to do with the quality or type of film -- just the
distributor.
     WARLOCK's story is slightly different: it was one of the last few
films still on the shelf at New World Pictures when that 'B' movie
powerhouse found that all its low-grossing schlock had come back to
haunt it straight into Chapter 11 proceedings.  Even two hit television
series (The Wonder Years and Tour of Duty) couldn't save it, and when
the lawyers had finally finished picking over its corpse, there was
WARLOCK, still in the can.  It appears that rather than let it go
completely to waste, some small and limited distribution was made
overseas (the Phantom believes that it may have had its world premiere
in Australia, of all places), followed quickly by an equally brief
showing stateside.  As the lights dimmed and the film began, the Phantom
was pleased to note the many scratches and splices that this "New York
premiere" copy of the print already contained.  Sadly, that print had
seen more states, more countries, and the insides of more theater
auditoriums than the Phantom is ever likely to see in his lifetime.
     (THE PUNISHER, WARLOCK's brother on the shelf at New World when the
debt hit the fan, is likely to suffer a similar fate; both films were
advertised in in-theater previews two years ago, and it's only now that
WARLOCK is seeing the light of day.  The Phantom is still rather eagerly
awaiting the estimable Mr.  Dolph Lundgren in his near-Shakespearean,
sure-to-be-remembered-at-Oscar-time performance.)
     That said, the Phantom should move on to the film itself, which
turned out to be quite enjoyable in a low-key, low-rent sort of way.
Directed by Steve Miner, WARLOCK feels very much like Miner's 1986
horror-comedy HOUSE, which turned out to be a surprise box-office hit.
It was a film that blended just enough laughs with just enough scares
and offered little to offend anyone.  Audiences responded well to its
style and pacing, which resembled nothing so much as an extended episode
of Tales from the Darkside.  It was, in a way, the ARACHNOPHOBIA of its
time -- though unlike ARACHNOPHOBIA, people actually went to see HOUSE.
     WARLOCK tells the story of an upwardly-mobile demon, who travels
through space and time in search of each of the pieces of the Devil's
Bible (which in the film is referred to very gravely as "The Grand Grim
Something-Or-Other" -- the Phantom can't quite remember, though everyone
had very serious expressions on their faces when they said it).  This
anti-Bible, when reassembled, would also show the true name of God,
which, if spoken backward, will cause all of existence to be uncreated
-- a sure way to end the film, if there ever was one, so it pretty much
guarantees that nothing of the sort will happen for at least 90 minutes.
For reassembling the Bible, the Warlock would be rewarded by meeting the
Cursed One himself, or by becoming his servant, or his chauffeur, or
personal assistant, or something of that nature.  In any case, it was a
definite career advancement for this very 80's-style warlock.  On second
thought, perhaps the Warlock wanted to be more downwardly-mobile than
upwardly-mobile.
     With long blonde pony-tail, custom (all-black) tailoring, and a
profile that looks like it came straight out of an Armani ad, Julian
Sands plays a very charming demon.  But trailing him out of the past --
in reverse TERMINATOR style -- is a certified "good guy" (to borrow a
phrase from Chuckie) named Redferne, who is bent on avenging the death
of his sweetheart.  And has been so for centuries.  Talk about
grudges...
     Redferne had last tangled with the Warlock in the film's opening
scenes (set in late 17th century Massachusetts), and it was only by the
narrowest of margins that the Warlock escaped public execution.
Curiously, he was sentenced to be hung and then burned over a basket of
live cats.  The Phantom isn't sure what effect this last part of the
sentence is supposed to have had -- perhaps baskets of live cats were
used regularly as part of the complex criminal justice system of the
late 17th century -- but as our Constitution now clearly prohibits
allowing cats anywhere near a public execution, the Phantom suspects
that such a sentence will come as quite a shock to some of the more
liberal members of the audience.  Frankly, the Phantom would consider
even 100 hours of community service with a basket full of live cats to
be cruel and inhuman punishment, and so he was once again reminded of
just how lucky he is to be living in these more enlightened times.
     Both the Warlock and Redferne pop up in late 80's Los Angeles,
which seems less of a shock to the Warlock than it does to Redferne, who
arrives (and remains) dressed somewhat peculiarly in furs, as if he had
last been tracking the Warlock through 17th century Montana rather than
pre-colonial Boston.  One of the film's small in-jokes is that neither
the Warlock nor Redferne attract much attention in L.A.
     Also on hand is our heroine -- Kassandra (with a 'K') -- who makes
the mistake of letting the Warlock get away with one of her personal
objects; as it happens, one of her cheap plastic bracelets is all he
needs to cast a devilish hex on her.  This gives Kassandra some personal
incentive -- beyond just the saving all of existence -- to help Redferne
stop the Warlock from completing his task and getting that corner office
in Hell.
     The film focuses almost exclusively on the chase, and this is just
as well, since it keeps the bogus Catholic theology to a minimum and the
plot humming along.  Other recent bogus Catholic theology horror films
have fared both better and worse: THE EXORCIST III was a far superior
film, but it took itself very seriously and was excessively stagey at
times.  On the other hand, no one -- apparently least of all the
filmmakers -- took THE FIRST POWER very seriously, and in addition, it
spent far too much time attempting to explain things and far too little
time on acting lessons for Tracy Griffith for it to have been much good.
(THE FIRST POWER was a terrible film, but in many ways it stands as the
best homage ever made to one of the worst horror -- or mainstream --
films of all time, EXORCIST II: THE HERETIC, a film that featured
nothing *but* pseudo-Catholic theology and fabulously bad acting.)
WARLOCK, by way of contrast, uses the Warlock's quest for the Grim
Whatever as the means to a very ordinary ends (a 60 minute chase with
the requisite fight to the death before the closing credits);
fortunately for us, it spares only the briefest of moments on all the
theological mumbo-jumbo.  In a sense, WARLOCK could be considered the
HARD TO KILL of horror films, and with his excess of charm and
male-model good looks, it's easy to think of the Warlock as the Steven
Seagal of demons.  Julian Sands plays the Warlock like Steven Seagal
plays, well, Steven Seagal, and the Phantom could never shake the
thought that at any moment the Warlock was going to take on a gang of
bikers in a billiards parlor, swinging a pool cue in lethal fashion
while keeping one eye on himself in the mirror over the bar.  However,
although the Warlock does engage in some gratuitous acts of violence
early on, he soon limits himself to scuffling with old Mennonite farmers
and threatening meek looking priests.
     Things proceed pretty much as you might expect -- WARLOCK is a film
that holds few surprises other than the timing and placement of a few
assorted Spring-Loaded Cats -- but the film doesn't really suffer for
being completely predictable any more than did THE TERMINATOR, on which
it is quite obviously based.  (WARLOCK also adds a dash of WITNESS and a
pinch of THE OMEN, just to keep from being too bland.)  Instead, its
predictability and good humor are its assets and account for much of the
film's considerable charm.  As with HOUSE, there is little for all but
the most severe critic to find fault with; it is a film that's much too
easy-going to dislike.  On the other hand, neither is it a film that
will be much remembered in a few months -- like a good episode of Tales
from the Darkside, one might think of it fondly for a week or two and
then let it fade painlessly from memory.  Unlike Tales from the
Darkside, however, WARLOCK will be back to remind us all of its
existence in a few months when it reincarnates itself as a video release
in Blockbusters nationwide.
     Among the film's high points are the acting, which is as good as it
gets in this sort of film -- though the Warlock's first victim could
give even Tracy Griffith a run for the worst actor of the nineties --
and the dialogue, which is unusually witty, especially when either the
Warlock or Redferne is uttering an oath of some sort.  Redferne's
Scottish accent is a tad bizarre, and he says "Tarry not" a lot, but his
speech and dialogue play off well against Kassandra's beach-bimbo L.A.
chatter.  There are continuity errors aplenty -- starting not even 10
seconds into the film with a pay telephone that rings as its receiver
hangs at the end of its cord -- but the plot has no gaping holes and at
least attempts to make sense when it needs to.  And although the special
effects sometimes seem to have been salvaged from POLTERGEIST's cutting
room floor, they are mostly adequate and occasionally first-rate.  As an
added bonus, the editing is quite good and the music, by Jerry
Goldsmith, is better than it has any right to be.
     To be honest, WARLOCK isn't really worth seeing in the theaters
(even if you can find a theater in which to see it).  Better to wait a
month or two and then check the recent release section at Blockbusters.
The film's easy-going nature and general good humor will play just as
well at home as it does in the theater, and the popcorn is free.  
     All in all, WARLOCK is not -- by any means -- a great horror film
-- but it's entertaining and diverting, and the Phantom recommends that
you give it a try, especially if you're looking for something a little
lighter than the standard horror fare.

Title
Review for Freddy's Dead: The Final Nightmare (1991)
     The Phantom feels good about this review, because with it he can
help nearly all of his readers.  All except those who have already seen
FREDDY'S DEAD: THE FINAL NIGHTMARE, that is.  There's not much that can
be done for those unfortunate few who bolted from the comfort and safety
of their homes to see Freddy's latest (and purportedly, his last) ELM
STREET film this past weekend.  Perhaps they were disappointed by
CHILD'S PLAY 3 the week before and figured that at the very least,
nothing could be worse.  Perhaps they were enticed by the prospect of
great special effects -- after all, as the print ads read, "they saved
the best for last."  Perhaps the rare opportunity of seeing another film
in 3-D did it.  Or perhaps it was just their self-appointed job, as it
was for the Phantom, Janet Maslin of the New York Times, and what
appeared to be most of the employees of New Line Cinema's New York
office (New Line has been the distributor of all of the ELM STREET
films).
     That in and of itself should have told the Phantom something.  The
premiere of TERMINATOR 2 was also filled with industry people (rows 10
through 14 were filled with nothing but ILM weenies), but that seemed
easy to understand.  After all, T2 was destined to be the summer's
blockbuster film, and if it weren't for the dedicated effort made by the
folks who work at the special effects houses, the film wouldn't be
nearly the success it is.  Why not go see it with a packed house of
eager movie-goers the night before opening day and see how your efforts
-- or those of your coworkers -- paid off?
     But it's hard to understand what those folks from New Line were
doing at the National Theater last Friday, except perhaps looking for an
excuse to cut out of work early.  Surely they couldn't have expected
people to stand up and cheer (as they did at the end of T2).  Or stay
seated and applaud (as they did at the end of DANCES WITH WOLVES).  Or
even keep their dissatisfaction to themselves (as they do at the end of
most films which fail to live up to their expectations)?  Given the
general grumbling heard by the Phantom on the way out, the last place he
would expect a New Line employee would want to be last Friday afternoon
is anywhere within range of rotten fruit.  (Alas, the Phantom forgot to
pick some up on the way in, so his preferred form of film criticism was
denied him.)
     So the Phantom can come to no other conclusion than that these poor
folks weren't going to get paid last week unless they attended the 4:00
show in an attempt to help fill what would otherwise be a rather empty
auditorium.  Additional confirmation for this theory was provided
outside the theater, where the Phantom looked on in amusement as the New
Line folks were told that even with their industry passes it would still
cost them $1 each to get in.  Since New Line at this point has more
unopened, returned copies of TEENAGE MUTANT NINJA TURTLES II than it has
dollar bills, the Phantom wasn't at all surprised to see that the
National's steep cover charge might prove their undoing.  Yet by the
time the film was over, even they did little more than provide what the
Phantom's believes was the very definition of a "smattering" of
applause.  They may not be hard workers; they may not be well-paid; but
they are loyal.
     Yet even a full refund wouldn't have kept the Phantom from wishing
that he had bought some popcorn at the concession stand.  How
frustrating it was to have to leave the theater without being able to
fully express his feelings about the nightmare that had just unfolded
before him.  And if some of the buttered kernels happened to fall on the
heads of the New Liners, it probably wouldn't have surprised them,
knowing as they did that at least one critic was in the audience -- Ms.
Maslin, like other film critics, wasn't allowed to see and review the
film before opening day because New Line didn't screen it before opening
day.  (As an aside, when a studio or distributor doesn't screen a film
before opening day, you can be fairly sure that there's a reason for it;
one can't pan a film one hasn't seen yet, can one?)
     Well, one has now seen this film, and one is therefore now quite
well prepared to pan it.  As was obvious to every phan unfortunate
enough to see Freddy in his last outing (THE DREAM CHILD), the ELM
STREET series has really been on the skids for a few years now.  The
first ELM STREET film was a certified original, a unique twist on the by
then standard slasher genre that allowed horror auteur Wes Craven to
transcend the limitations of ordinary horror villains in a more-or-less
plausible way.  Freddy was a little more scary and a little less funny
back in those days, and the sequels never really matched the original.
On the other hand, the first two sequels were well made and very
entertaining in their own right, and by the fourth (THE DREAM MASTER),
Freddy had turned into a veritable cottage industry, spawning a
television series and a line of Halloween makeup that made everyone
involved an awful lot of money.  In short, Freddy achieved the celebrity
status that had always eluded Michael and Jason -- the serial killers
from the HALLOWEEN and FRIDAY THE 13TH serials respectively -- and it
quickly became apparent that New Line had the cinematic equivalent of
the Golden Goose on its hands.  Freddy's films were relatively
inexpensive to make, and people apparently couldn't get enough of him.
     That is until DREAM CHILD, when someone decided that people really
*would* see anything with Freddy in it, regardless of how good -- or, in
this case, bad -- it was.  That's always a mistake, and in this case it
left the Goose's neck on the chopping block, anxiously awaiting a
reprieve from the farmers at New Line -- and more importantly, from
Freddy's still-loyal phans.  After DREAM CHILD, there were two ways to
go.  Either New Line could find a writer and a director who would
breathe some life back into the series, or they could drop the axe and
make whatever money they could as quickly as they could and kill the
series once and for all.  After leaving FREDDY'S DEAD, the Phantom
should have asked the folks from New Line what they were having for
dinner later that night, but he suspected that at least for some of
them, roast goose was on the menu.
     The problem with DREAM CHILD was that despite all the money spent
on special effects (which were an increasingly costly and escalating
proposition since THE DREAM WARRIORS), it was a fairly boring film.  Not
bad, really, but not interesting either, and shortly after it opened,
word of mouth saw it to a speedy closing.  All of a sudden, it seemed
that Freddy wasn't perhaps the drawing card that New Line thought he
was; after the smoke cleared, it wasn't clear whether there would even
*be* another sequel.
     But another sequel there is: FREDDY'S DEAD, the first of the ELM
STREET films not to use the words "A NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET" in its
title.  That now seems strangely appropriate to the Phantom, for
FREDDY'S DEAD is less like an honest sequel to the original 1984 horror
classic than a big joke played on everyone who has the misfortune of
seeing it.  From the jokey title (a play on the early 70s Curtis
Mayfield hit); to the 3-D glasses (which are in fact good for nothing
but making you feel like a complete fool until the last 15 minutes of
the film -- the first 115 are in two dimensions, though of course the
characters are only drawn in one); to the throwaway special effects
(which are not very especially special); FREDDY'S DEAD provides ELM
STREET phans with a very sad, very tawdry sendoff for one of our
favorite horror personalities.  Romero did better by his DEAD; it's too
bad that New Line couldn't have done better by Wes' Freddy.
     What can be said of an ELM STREET film in which only three people
die (four, including Freddy)?  Such a film simply doesn't have its heart
in the right place.  Or what of a film that's advertised as being in
"3-D FreddyVision" and yet has no 3-D effects until the last 15 minutes?
(By the way, the joke was certainly on the Phantom and his fellow
audience members at the National last Friday.  We all dutifully put on
our vintage 50s red/blue 3-D glasses right at the start of the film --
and then spent the next 10 to 30 minutes peering over them, under them,
and around them in vain search of any effect that could even be
construed as being in three dimensions.  "There ain't a *damn* thing 3-D
about this!" was the most apt summary overheard by the Phantom during
the film's exceedingly flat beginning.)  Still not convinced?  Okay, how
about Roseanne and her husband Tom Arnold as deranged residents of the
now-childless Springfield?  See, it's a joke, son!  Laugh it up, why
don't you!
     The Phantom did indeed come close to doubling up once or twice, but
it most assuredly wasn't from laughter.  Rather it was from watching the
most lackluster and uninteresting ELM STREET film ever.  The characters
were dull; the special effects were....  Oh, the Phantom went through
this once already, didn't he?  Comes from trying to write too many
sequels to his own reviews, perhaps.  Got your magic 3-D reviewing
glasses on, phans?
     The plot might have been interesting, but the idea -- discovering
how Freddy became the oh-so-unneighborly guy he is by looking at scenes
from his tortured past -- is almost completely wasted.  Robert Englund
does what he can out of makeup, but oh how the Phantom longed for Terry
O'Quinn and a performance even half as good -- and half as scary -- as
the one he turned in for THE STEPFATHER.  The rest of the cast is
uniformly uninteresting; character development has been rolling steadly
downhill since DREAM WARRIORS.
     We learn that Freddy has a child that was taken from him, and that
he has been seeking revenge on everyone else's children since he was
burned alive by the angry townsfolk of Springfield.  It might have been
possible to explore in some depth Freddy's relationship to his son or
daughter (the Phantom's not telling which, though it hardly matters in
the scheme of things), and that might have made FREDDY'S DEAD much more
interesting than it is.  Something along these lines was attempted in
ELM STREET 2, and because of that it remains the most intelligent and
interesting of the sequels (though perhaps not the crowd-pleaser that
later sequels were).  But such discussion and exposition is postponed
until the "final confrontation", and by then it is much too late.
     We do, however, get to see -- in 3-D, no less -- those spirits of
the underworld with which Freddy Krueger makes his fateful pact.  As the
flames surge around him, these dream agents offer Freddy immortality as
long as he spends it collecting children's souls, television residuals,
and product endorsements.  They may come from the depths of hell, but
agents are, after all, agents.  It wasn't clear to the Phantom whether
these dream agents get 10% of the souls that Freddy collects, but he
suspects that some arrangement along those lines was worked out.
(Naturally the agents looked like flying skulls with short spinal cord
tails -- all mouth and no heart, you might say.)
     Alas, the dream agents have let Freddy down; with FREDDY'S DEAD,
the Golden Goose has been cooked, and the series ends not with a bang
but a smirk.  Though the 3-D at the end is fun (the Phantom's always had
a soft spot for 3-D, ever since it was revived in the 1981 spaghetti
western COMIN' AT YA), it's a shame that it was implemented with
red/blue glasses rather than polarized glasses -- the result is not
nearly as good as it could have been, and so those phans who go in
expecting something similar to FRIDAY THE 13TH PART 3 are going to be
doubly disappointed.
     It was kind of sad watching FREDDY'S DEAD and seeing what had
become of the premiere horror series of the eighties.  Though it
concentrated less on horror than on crowd-pleasing special effects and
humor in its later sequels, the ELM STREET series was like a favorite
pair of jeans -- something you could slip into and feel comfortable with
no matter how torn up it got.  But Hollywood never seems to learn the
lesson that last summer's season of dud sequels brought home with a
vengeance: that although audiences may not always be as discerning as we
critics would like them to be, and though they may not always know
quality when they see it, they certainly have no trouble perceiving a
lack quality and effort, and they'll stay away in droves from films that
don't at least make an honest attempt to entertain, if nothing else.
     About the only people who might enjoy FREDDY'S DEAD are those who
will see *anything at all* in 3-D -- the Phantom isn't sure whether the
video release will also be in "FreddyVision"; on the other hand, given
the bad word of mouth that this last ELM STREET film is generating, it's
likely that we'll all find out quite soon.

Title
Review for Brain Dead (1990)
     As the Phantom mentioned last week in his review of the unfortunate
TALES FROM THE DARKSIDE, the film so disappointed and disillusioned him
that he was forced to seek solace in the arms of the Criterion Center,
New York's sleaziest legitimate theater.  Whenever he comes to believe
that films -- and especially horror films -- have become too mainstream,
too middle-of-the-road, too tame and too, well, boring, he checks out
the Criterion, conveniently located in the heart of Times Square (home
to more sleaze than the boards of a dozen Texas savings and loans).
     He had quite a selection of choice films from which to choose, and
although several of the ninja and revenge films seemed to have much to
recommend them, he chose BRAIN DEAD instead because he felt it so aptly
described the sad excuse for a horror film to which he had just been
subjected.
     So imagine his surprise when he found that not only was BRAIN DEAD
a cut above the average horror film (and at least three cuts above the
cut-rate TALES), but that it was a superb example of the genre, a
little-known and limited-release gem in the rough of big budget and big
name bungles.
     BRAIN DEAD is good for the same reasons that TALES was not: for
one, someone actually sat down and wrote an intelligent script.  For
another, that person was Charles Beaumont, one of the original writers
for the "Twilight Zone" series.  And finally, BRAIN DEAD was directed
with style and confidence by Adam Simon, a director with whom the
Phantom is not familiar, but one whom he hopes will continue working in
the field.  The last director who so impressed the Phantom was John
McNaughton, who brought us the incredible HENRY: PORTRAIT OF A SERIAL
KILLER; before that, the Phantom would have to go back to Sam Raimi and
his equally stylish and compelling EVIL DEAD series.
     Such directors are quite obviously few and far between.  Now, lest
the Phantom raise his phan's hopes too high, let him say that while
BRAIN DEAD is quite good, it isn't really in the same class as either
McNaughton or Raimi's masterpieces.  BRAIN DEAD is stylish, it's fairly
original, it's well written, but it does have problems.
     Before we get to the problems, though, the Phantom will attempt a
brief plot synopsis: "It's a dream, isn't it?"
     That's about it.  Throughout the film, it's never quite clear what
is and isn't a dream; Beaumont and Simon lead us on for ten or fifteen
minutes at a time, only to confound our expectations time and time
again.  The protagonist appears to be involved in brain research --
particularly in the mapping of specific thoughts, actions and
personality traits to specific portions of the brain -- and he's called
upon to help a mathematician who was hospitalized after he cracked
during a particularly difficult equation -- and one that evidently would
lead to a conclusion of unspeakable violence (this is implied by the
mushroom cloud drawn just to the right of the equals sign).  In fact,
the corporation for which he works has the blackboard containing the
equation, but they don't have the right side -- just the left, and a
paranoid schizophrenic who used to be their star researcher.
     Of course, this theme has been touched upon by countless horror
films in the past (most popularly in the NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET
series); its roots go back to the stellar DEAD OF NIGHT in 1945, a film
that predated the "Twilight Zone" television series by 20 years and
provided the inspiration for many of its best episodes (the Phantom is
indebted to Brandi Weed, who reminded him of this wonderful classic --
those phans who enjoy classic Zone episodes will be more than pleased by
this very early horror effort).  But rarely has the theme of dream vs.
reality been carried quite so far, and for so much of a film, as it has
been in BRAIN DEAD.
     In the Phantom's eyes, this is what makes BRAIN DEAD a cut above
the average horror film.  As he mentioned in his review of TALES FROM
THE DARKSIDE, most horror films suffer from an excess of exposition --
the writers and directors spend much too much time on perfectly ordinary
scenes of perfectly ordinary people doing perfectly ordinary things in
the hopes that these scenes will provide dramatic contrast with the
horror to come.  Sometimes this works -- HALLOWEEN and NIGHT OF THE
LIVING DEAD come to mind -- but most often it doesn't, and instead it
creates the "7 minutes of tedium" scenario that we've grown to loathe
but live with in the interminable FRIDAY THE 13TH SERIES: for every
killing or suspenseful scene, there is a corresponding seven minutes of
pointless dialogue and exposition ("Where's Sally?"  "I don't know."
"Is she in the barn?"  "Maybe she's in the basement."  "Should we go
down there?" and on and on, ad infinitum and ad nauseam) that do
nothing but help us bide our time until the screenplay gets back to
Jason, his hockey mask, and his impressive array of gardening
implements.
     But in BRAIN DEAD Beaumont and Simon have all but done away with
the "curse of the 7-minute-space filler"; throughout the film even the
blind alleys are interesting, and we spend so much time trying to figure
out whether what we're seeing is "real" that we barely have enough time
to catch our breath and pat ourselves on the back for figuring things
out before we're sent off into still another dream (or, as is more
frequently the case, another nightmare).
     This, too, is one of the best things about BRAIN DEAD: whereas most
horror films use dreams and dream sequences and the contrast between
dreams and reality in a cheap and exploitative way, Beaumont and Simon
do an admirable job of exploring the theme.  Throughout the film, they
avoid most of the more sensationalistic and shocking aspects of the
"dream within a dream" sequences: unlike in, say, AN AMERICAN WEREWOLF
IN LONDON or CARRIE, people don't suddenly wake up beside dead people or
thrust their hands through the six feet of dirt covering their coffins.
While those kinds of thrills are fun, they have to be taken in
moderation -- if in the ELM STREET series Freddy could appear at will
anywhere at any time, there wouldn't be much point to having chase
sequences, and the films themselves would be almost wholly without
suspense.  Instead, the dreams in BRAIN DEAD go on for tens of minutes
at a time, and this turns out to be a much more effective and disturbing
technique than the quick scares that comprise most horror films.
Showing decomposing corpses is easy; having "reality" degenerate slowly
but surely into the impossible landscape of a nightmare is difficult.
But it's also very effective, and the Phantom thinks that it will be
much more greatly appreciated by true phans of the genre.
     Unfortunately, in structuring a film like this they also break one
of the cardinal rules of the game: continuity.  By the time BRAIN DEAD
nears its end, we feel somewhat cheated because we find that there is no
way to keep the "story" straight in our minds.  The Phantom wished he'd
saved his FIRST POWER score card; there are so many false leads and
blind alleys in BRAIN DEAD that he felt somewhat frustrated by the time
his popcorn ran out (though in truth that might have been the real
reason for his frustration).
     For some, this may be what ultimately sinks the film.  The Phantom
believes that he is better than most at suspending disbelief and
accepting whatever premise with which the filmmakers wish to proceed,
but even he started having difficulty with BRAIN DEAD toward the end.
However, those phans who stick it out will be amply rewarded: unlike
run-of-the-mill horror films made by run-of-the-mill directors with
dreams of sequels dancing in their heads, BRAIN DEAD has a real,
believable and satisfying ending.  As he unstuck his sneakers from the
floor and left the theater, the Phantom caught himself thinking that
with the exception of the exceptionally literate HENRY, it had been a
long time since he had seen a film -- horror or otherwise -- that had an
ending other than "trap/catch the bad guy/zombie/Russian sub commander
and kill him/disintegrate him/repatriate him."  For all its faults and
sometimes faulty logic, BRAIN DEAD has a real and reasonable ending, and
that, too, puts it a cut above the competition.
     So, phans, on the whole the Phantom highly recommends this one.
Alas, BRAIN DEAD seems to be in very limited release -- so much so that
he never saw a newspaper advertisement for it -- so phans who wish to
see it will probably have to wait until it makes its Blockbusters debut.
That's especially a shame in this case, since BRAIN DEAD boasts some
stunning cinematography and clever camera work that will likely be lost
on the small screen.  (And yes, that last sentence does set off even the
Phantom's alliteration alert, but thank you so much for noticing....)

Title
Review for First Power, The (1990)
     THE FIRST POWER is what Hollywood insiders call a "high concept" film.
For those phans who aren't familiar with the term, high concept films are films
that can be pitched to agents and studio executives in one sentence.  That's
important, since most of the people in the film industry have just slightly
less patience than they have talent; a two or three paragraph summary would
have most nodding off before you could say "cut to the chase."
     But just because you can summarize a film's plot in one sentence doesn't
make it a high concept film, for otherwise nearly every film made since the
late 50s could be considered high concept.  How best can the Phantom explain?
Let us consider, by way of example, THE OMEN and its two sequels.  None of
these films are high concept; the original most certainly isn't, even though
its plot is far from complicated.  And its sequels, while easily described (but
alas, less easily watched), are just more of the same.  This summer's DIE HARD
2 isn't really high concept either, but it comes close ("OK, OK, so this time
Willis is in an airport, get it?").
     But how about our imaginary third sequel, DIE HARD 3: NOT OF THIS EARTH?
(No, the title doesn't refer to Willis' salary.)  I'll pitch it to you, phans,
and if one of you sells it to Fox remember, the Phantom wants his money above
the line.  Here's the high concept pitch: "OK, OK, so it's like DIE HARD meets
ALIENS, right?  Willis is stuck in Moonbase Alpha and meanwhile this thing
flies out and attaches itself to his ex-wife's face...."
     Now *that's* high concept.  The giveaway: any time you use the word
"meets" in a description, you're pitching with the best of them.
     This brings us, in a rather more roundabout way than usual, to the subject
of this week's review, THE FIRST POWER, a film that is nothing if not high
concept.  Here's the pitch: "OK, OK, so imagine THE OMEN but with those Brat
Pack kids, like Damien meets YOUNG GUNS, right?  And the killer's like "Freddy
meets SHOCKER," so we can throw in a lot of dream sequences.  And we'll do the
LETHAL WEAPON thing -- make it funny.  Did I leave anything out?"  And true to
its pitch, THE FIRST POWER is the epitome of high concept films.
     The Phantom went into THE FIRST POWER expecting an updated version of THE
OMEN, one of his all-time favorite horror films.  And to be fair, THE FIRST
POWER is exactly that, though since it's a 90s horror film, it can't help but
be influenced by the legacy of the 80s, including Jason and Michael, but most
especially Freddy.  In fact, in many ways, THE FIRST POWER is a better ELM
STREET sequel than was DREAM CHILD.
     Problems abound though.  For the Phantom, one of the biggest problems was
the miscasting of Lou Diamond Phillips as Logan, a cynical LA cop who heads the
investigation into a series of bizarre occult killings.  ("Bizarre occult
killings"?  The Phantom is going to have to stop writing his reviews during
Eyewitness News....)  Tracy Griffith, as Tess Seaton, the psychic who helps
Logan find the killer, doesn't help matters.  Both roles call for much older
actors, and though Lou and Tracy do their best, they really can't pull it off.
Of the two, Lou Diamond Phillips does a better job, but that's perhaps because
he has more experience than does Griffith.
     The film's plot is fairly simple, although its exposition is somewhat
confused.  Tess "sees" where the killer (Patrick Channing, played to the hilt
by Jeff Kober) is going to strike next.  Though she is curiously mute on the
point of *who* is he going to strike next, she tells Logan where Channing is
going to be, but only on the condition that he promise that there will be no
death penalty.  Why she believes that a cop could possibly honor such a promise
is one of the least puzzling aspects of the film, though it is sadly indicative
of the feeble plot devices that abound throughout.  In any case, suffice it to
say that Logan would have been wise to plead Channing's case before the Supreme
Court, since once he is executed, he gets much more screen time than he did
when he was just a garden variety, occult-inspired, serial killer.
     Indeed, it turns out that all those pentagrams that Channing had been
carving into his victims served a purpose: Channing made a deal with the Devil,
who in return has granted him what the film refers to as "the first power."  At
a very late stage in the film, the audience gets to find out what all the other
powers are (there are three), though by the time we're told, it's rather hard
to care; the "powers" seem to exist solely to explain the film's title, which
would better have been left as TRANSIT, the title by which it was known
throughout preproduction.  At least TRANSIT is original, and as a title it
makes as much sense as does anything else about the film, so perhaps then
audiences would be more prepared for the barrage of plot holes awaiting them
after the last preview is over.
     As to the film's title: according to a slightly deranged nun, the first
power is the power of resurrection.  The second and third powers are related to
this, though as the Phantom scored poorly on the "bogus Catholic theology" quiz
in the theater lobby, he is unable to explain precisely what those other powers
might be.  He himself had sadly lost his own first power, the power of
concentration, by the time the film had gotten around to explaining all of this
to the audience.
     In any case, once Channing has been dispatched, he returns in a number of
ways and in several different guises, since he has the power to take control of
the recently dead (but oh how the Phantom wished he had the power to take
control of the plot).  Sadly, Channing seems to have little motive for coming
back or not; though he pops in and out of the rest of the film (and of course
fights Logan to the death in the rather less than epic struggle at the film's
end), it's not clear why.  Surely if he wanted to kill Logan or Tess he could
just appear, push them into a bad career move, and leave.  But by the middle of
the film, there are really only three main characters, so unfortunately
Channing does not have the luxury of Freddy, Michael, or Jason; the screenplay
doesn't allow for a similar, metronome-like killing every 10 minutes.
     Still, things do get interesting when Channing makes an appearance, and
the audience never fails to perk up, if only because they know that an
appearance by Channing means that they'll have a badly need, though
all-too-brief, respite from Tracy Griffith's acting.  Tracy's very young face
is capable of nearly three different expressions, and we're treated to all of
them in various, usually inappropriate, combinations.  We're also treated to
dozens of scenes filled with, and focused on, her chest (though she never goes
topless).  But if there's a tight tee-shirt around, she'll wear it; if she has
to stand still, she'll be sure to throw her shoulders back; if she has to move,
she'll make every attempt to run toward the camera; and if she has to lie on
the ground, you can bet she'll be spread-eagled.  To be fair, she only lies on
the ground in one scene, but for that scene she removes her bra, just to keep
things interesting.
     This is, of course, nothing more than a classic case of
"naked-Ripley-syndrome" (from ALIEN: "I've just escaped the monsters, so I
better strip off all my clothes..."), and though The Phantom appreciates any
bit of sexploitation thrown his way, even he felt that someone here was going
overboard.  Tracy would be well advised to consult with Melanie or Don before
making her next film, since if this trend continues she'll have her name above
the credits for BLUE LAGOON II: THE NEXT GENERATION before she knows what hit
her.  Think, Tracy -- do you really want to be our generation's Phoebe Cates?
     As for Lou Diamond Phillips, he does his best, but he really looks less
than comfortable here.  He gets kicked around an awful lot in this film (in
fact the fight scenes are fabulously unrealistic -- most reminded the Phantom
of Dolph and Sly going at it in ROCKY IV), and he always appears to be dreading
the next scene.  Will it be Channing this time?  Will he be thrown off a roof?
Down a sewer?  Will the stunt-nun finally get him?  Logan's life is not an easy
one, and the Phantom was impressed with how well Phillips held up even after
taking all those kicks to the head.  Of course, the Phantom could sympathize a
little, since after THE FIRST POWER, he, too, felt like he had taken a few too
many kicks to the head -- by the time every one ends up in the sewer (no doubt
tripping over screenplays for THE SECOND POWER), he needed a score card to keep
track of who killed whom and of those, who was dead, who had been resurrected,
and who was currently possessed.
     But the Phantom doesn't want to paint an entirely bleak picture.  Although
it doesn't make sense for even 10 minutes, THE FIRST POWER was still
entertaining, especially if you could forgive it all of its self-contradictions
and other stupidities.  Although there are enough dream sequences to make even
Freddy roll his eyes, they're still fun to watch, and they're even occasionally
scary.  On the whole, the cinematography is above average -- the film doesn't
have that flat, mass-produced look that so many horror films have -- and Jeff
Kober does a great job as Channing.  This is the director, Robert Resnikoff's,
first film, and he does a fairly good job, given the absurdity of a screenplay
he had to work with.  Resnikoff has a good feel for horror, and the Phantom
hopes that he'll be back soon with another film, though he believes that next
time he and his crew should take a lunch together and decide just exactly what
kind of film they want to make *before* they start shooting.  "A little bit of
everything that was successful over the past 5 years" just doesn't cut it.
     So the Phantom is undecided: should he recommend that his phans see THE
FIRST POWER now, or wait until it hits Blockbusters?  For all its problems, THE
FIRST POWER is still fun to watch, and it's rarely boring.  But is it worth
$7.50?  Let the Phantom put it this way: if you liked SHOCKER, you'll like THE
FIRST POWER.  If you were upset that SHOCKER turned out to be so utterly
brainless, it might be best to wait for the $2, two-night special, since THE
FIRST POWER is, unfortunately, very nearly a homage to Wes Craven's botched
masterpiece.
     Perhaps the Phantom will organize a half-film festival, for all the films
he's seen recently that start out so well, but then take a bad turn about
half-way through, and finally end very badly indeed.  Admission will be
half-price, of course, and all the films will start every half hour, so his
phans can get up and walk out when a film's gone half way to hell (if a film's
gone all to hell, you know you've stayed too long).  Not a half bad idea, if
the Phantom does say so himself.

Title
Review for Child's Play 2 (1990)
     This year, horror phans missed three expected installments in three
lengthy sequel-fests that had been passing themselves off as original
horror entertainment for the better part of the eighties: FRIDAY THE
13TH, A NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET, and HALLOWEEN.  The Phantom had hoped
that this meant that the trend toward the profitable -- though generally
unsatisfying -- creation of sequel after horror sequel was waning.
Though nearly a third of the horror films released this year have been
sequels of one sort or another, most were more or less successful
extensions of ideas that had been explored years ago.  For example,
though THE EXORCIST III is most certainly a sequel, it doesn't simply
rehash the original's story in a brazen attempt to bilk more money out
of loyal horror phans.  The same is true for the other half dozen or so
horror sequels that were released this past year.  In BASKET CASE 2,
Frank Henenlotter used the same characters from his shoe-string-budgeted
cult classic, but the film is otherwise quite original -- it doesn't
simply rehash the original story, differing only in the intensity of the
special effects and the size of the budget.
     In that sense, these sequels were more welcome than the cheaply
made near-serials starring Michael and Jason and even Freddy (in his
later years).  While the Phantom almost always enjoys an original film
more than he does a sequel, there is no doubt that some of the best
horror films have been either remakes or sequels.
     Unfortunately, CHILD'S PLAY 2 isn't one of them, even though it is
very entertaining in its own right.  But this really shouldn't come as
much surprise.  The original CHILD'S PLAY was somewhat of a phenomenon:
between Don Mancini's clever script and Tom Holland's skillful
direction, audiences barely blinked an eye at the thought of a small,
battery-operated, freckle-faced serial killer in cute little overalls.
And though the film itself wasn't completely original -- it had obvious
origins in the TV film TRILOGY OF TERROR (in which a tiny voodoo doll
terrorized Karen Black), a number of "Twilight Zone" episodes, and
Stuart Gordon's excellent DOLLS -- it was different enough from the
countless more-or-less standardized horror films of the time to gain a
huge audience.  Since then, other copy-cat films (like PUPPETMASTER)
have tried to capitalize on what turned out to be the most successful
mass-market concept in horror since Freddy debuted in A NIGHTMARE ON ELM
STREET over six years ago, but none have been as good, as original, or
as successful.
     Of course, one of the biggest things that CHILD'S PLAY had going
for it was that it was simply so audacious.  Horror phans had seen
unstoppable men in hockey masks; they'd seen vengeful adolescents
celebrating everything but Groundhog's Day with a killing spree; they'd
even seen the wisecracking Freddy dispatch dozens of photogenic teens in
dozens of interesting ways.  But what they hadn't seen was a killer
birthday present -- a child's worst nightmare come true.  And because
Tom Holland did such a wonderful job with the idea, people weren't
really concerned that a three-foot-tall, red haired doll really
shouldn't be able to pose that much of a threat to Andy (the child who
owned him), let alone all the adults he dispatched with curious ease.
Holland and Mancini did such a good job, in fact, that audiences let out
barely a giggle at the sight of Chucky launching himself like a gymnast
at some unsuspecting adult, wrapping his arms as far around that adult's
neck as they would go, and then kicking his little plastic legs so
wildly that the adult would be all but unable to keep from falling out a
window, tripping over a strategically placed piece of furniture and
cracking his head open, or falling on some sharp kitchen implement that
just so happened to be out of the knife rack.
     Mancini's script for CHILD'S PLAY also had a great deal of wit, and
this, too, helped the film immeasurably.  The subtext to CHILD'S PLAY --
that of a small child who knows something is true yet can't get an adult
to believe him -- is a common one in children's stories, and it's a
theme with which even those in the audience over the age of seven can
identify.  It's very different from the standard "teenager runs to the
Crystal Lake police babbling about an unstoppable maniac in a hockey
mask"; the very fact that Chucky is Andy's "friend to the end," and that
that "friend" would then turn on him and threaten to kill him, gave the
film the quality of a fairy tale that had turned into a nightmare.
     That intelligence can be seen in other aspects of the film as well.
Chucky generally killed people in believable ways (though as in all
horror films logic must occasionally take a back seat to action and
suspense), and the focus of much of the film was Andy rather than
Chucky, making the resemblance to a fairy tale even more pronounced.
Holland and Mancini purposefully made the first half of the film more
like an episode of the Twilight Zone than a horror film -- it's not
until well into CHILD'S PLAY that Chucky finally speaks and starts
acting like the self-possessed doll that he is.  Before that point,
Chucky is no more than another "Good Guy" doll -- albeit one that goes
back into the living room and watches the Nine O'Clock News after he was
put to bed.
     Seen in this context, it is easier to understand why the film was a
sleeper hit, and why even adults who would not ordinarily go out of
their way to see a horror film went to see CHILD'S PLAY, just as they
had gone to THE EXORCIST, THE OMEN, and FATAL ATTRACTION before it.  But
this is the fundamental problem with CHILD'S PLAY 2; although there are
a good number of wonderful and witty touches scattered throughout the
film, and although the sequel's director, John Lafia (who co-wrote the
original), is more than competent enough to do the story justice, the
film feels more like an early eighties slash-and-trash flick than
anything else.  And that is why CHILD'S PLAY 2, though enjoyable, is a
bit of a disappointment.
     The Phantom should explain, since the feeling he got was a subtle
one, and he wouldn't want to be misunderstood; certainly, CHILD'S PLAY 2
bares little resemblance to FRIDAY THE 13TH PART VI or MY BLOODY
VALENTINE.  But the film's orientation is very different than was that
of the original.  The focus of the film is no longer Andy, and the cruel
joke of a killer birthday present has already been played out.  In
short, the wonderful duality of the original -- a child's knowledge vs.
adult disbelief and a "good guy" turned bad guy -- is gone.
     In its place are two signature features of the slash-and-trash
flick: endless scenes of stupid people doing stupid things in the dark,
never thinking of calling the police or simply running for their lives;
and the classic denouement, featuring the last living teenage girl being
stalked by a homicidal maniac while she bumps into the carefully hidden
bodies of her dead friends.  Chucky killed a few couple of people in the
original, but that was never the focus of the film.  Unfortunately, in
CHILD'S PLAY 2 it is.
     A related problem is that CHILD'S PLAY 2 has a relatively high
TOTAL-B quotient.  Related to the SLC ("Spring-Loaded Cat") quotient, a
standard measure of horror and adventure film quality, the "Turn On The
Light, Bitch!" quotient is usually highest in horror films that are
written and directed by people whose real talents apparently lie
elsewhere.  Like the SLC quotient, the TOTAL-B quotient was made an art
form by Ridley Scott in his superb ALIEN, a film in which nearly every
single scare and thrill came because someone stumbled into the monster
while searching for a troublesome cat in the dark.  Scott is, of course,
an acknowledged master of the form, but in lesser hands a high level of
both quotients indicates a film on which little thought has been
expended and on upon which little time has been spent.
     To its credit, however, CHILD'S PLAY 2 is really a cut above the
usual slash-and-trash trash, even though it is a cut well below its
predecessor.  One reason is that Brad Dourif has a field day with Chucky
-- he played the Lakeshore Strangler in the original, as well as the
voice of the "evil" Chucky -- since in the sequel, Chucky is "evil" from
the opening scene.  Dourif doesn't quite top his performance in THE
EXORCIST III, but given the constraints of his role in CHILD'S PLAY 2,
he gives Chucky a memorable (and marketable) personality.
     It's also obvious that Mancini and Lafia did nearly as well with
the film as they could, given the constraints of the premise.  Now that
it is no longer possible to generate suspense about whether or not
Chucky is alive (and no possibility of repeating the wonderful scene in
the original in which Andy's mother discovers that Chucky's batteries
are still in his box), the filmmakers have to rely on humor and more
traditional horror themes -- an uncomfortable compromise at best.
     It's the film's humor that really saves it; for all of its
slash-and-trash trappings, there is really quite a lot of humor in
CHILD'S PLAY 2 -- much more than there was in the original -- and it
helps make up for the film's unfortunate lack of originality.  Phans of
the original -- and of horror films in general -- will be especially
happy to discover that there is another scene that plays like a homage
to Stanley Kubrick's horror classic THE SHINING (phans who want details
should write to the Phantom, since he does not want to spoil these
wonderful touches in either film).  And just when it seems that the film
is going to bog down in the worst cliches of the genre (that of a
homicidal killer stalking a pretty teenage girl), the film moves to a
very well-done denouement inside the Good Guys factory.  Some reviewers
have commented on the unlikely layout of the factory, but to the Phantom
it seemed perfectly natural (and to be frank, if the thought of a
three-foot-tall killer doll doesn't seem unlikely, it's not clear why
the Good Guys factory should disturb reviewers so -- the very fact that
it's located in Chicago rather than Taiwan should signal the audience
that there's something supernatural about it).  Sadly, it is only then
-- as the film ends -- that the filmmakers are able to recapture some of
the original's irony, and it is only then that CHILD'S PLAY 2 shows
signs that, but for a unique gimmick, it is not an entirely standard
horror film.
     And the story itself (this is a first for the Phantom: 1800 words
and not a mention of what the film is *about*)?  It's not bad, again
given the constraints of the premise.  Chucky's head is recovered from
Andy's apartment by Good Guys technicians and for reasons not entirely
clear, restored to a new body.  The president of the company wants to be
sure that the doll couldn't have malfunctioned in some way -- talk about
product liability suits!  -- and this is all fine and well, except that
the doll was burnt to a crisp and literally blown apart by the end of
the original.  But OK, it's just the same old, same old from the
illogical world of the horror sequel, and nothing to get too concerned
about.
     Of course, Chucky magically comes back to life, and once again the
spirit of the Lakeshore Strangler has to find Andy so that he won't be
trapped in Chucky's body for all eternity (or at least until everyone
tires of Chucky sequels).  Find him he does, in the process killing a
good number of people in interesting and unlikely ways.  Andy's new
foster parents don't, of course, believe that Andy's doll is alive and
looking for him, and neither does his soon-to-be-heroic foster sister,
but after a while it doesn't really matter any more, since the
belief/non-belief question becomes moot: everyone who might have been
convinced that Chucky was really alive is eventually killed.
     It's really this, more than anything else, that makes much of
CHILD'S PLAY 2 feel like a fairly standard horror film, though one with
a fun gimmick and a sense of style.  But unlike the original, in which
Chucky tossed Dinah Manoff out the window, in the sequel it's logic that
is similarly done away with, and while the film's veneer of humor covers
most of the problems this causes, the sheer number of unlikely things
that happen in the film -- including an awful lot of the killings --
started bothering the Phantom about half-way through.
     But if you don't go expecting the originality and style of CHILD'S
PLAY, and if you don't mind a plot straight out of any of hundred
slash-and-trash horror films of the mid-eighties, the Phantom thinks
you'll find CHILD'S PLAY 2 quite enjoyable.  It's not very original, but
it is -- usually -- fairly clever.  And it's always enjoyable.  See it
with somewhat reduced expectations and with a rowdy audience, and the
Phantom thinks that you should have a fine time with the new, Jasonized
version of Chucky.  Who knows?  Maybe in a year or two Chucky will knock
Robert Englund off as the reigning king of the horror serial -- after
all, we horror phans need our Indy Joneses and Luke Skywalkers just like
everyone else.

Title
Review for People Under the Stairs, The (1992)
     The Phantom missed the opening titles for THE PEOPLE UNDER THE
STAIRS, Wes Craven's latest horror film -- he was under the impression
that it took less than 30 minutes to get from lower Manhattan to
midtown, an impression the New York City Transit Authority apparently
doesn't share -- so he doesn't know how good they were.  Perhaps they
were clever; perhaps they were scary; perhaps they leaped onto the
screen from under a staircase.  The Phantom just doesn't know, since he
arrived just a few moments too late to catch them.  He sincerely hopes
that they were good, however, since most of the rest of the film (which
he did not, unfortunately, arrive too late to miss) ranged from bad to
awful; from dopey to imbecilic; from silly to sorry.
     Simply put, PEOPLE is a mess.  Worse still, it's Wes' mess -- all
of it.  Though one can look at the last few scenes of EXORCIST III and
see the meddling hand of nervous studio executives -- people who felt
that if William Friedkin's excellent and very literate film didn't have
at least one gory exorcism, no one would go see it -- it's quite obvious
that PEOPLE was Wes' baby from first reel to last.
     It's hard to say what was going through Craven's mind when he set
out to make this film.  Although it's possible to make a horror film
that also works as a comedy, it's not an easy task, and the result is
rarely successful as either a horror film or a comedy.  Sam Raimi's EVIL
DEAD 2 did succeed in this, but it also had the luxury of having a
successful horror film -- the original EVIL DEAD -- to satirize.  On the
other hand, consider the abominable sequel to THE TEXAS CHAINSAW
MASSACRE.  Here again, director Tobe Hooper had the opportunity to
satirize the classic original, but the result was as close to a complete
failure as is imaginable.  TCM II worked neither as a horror film nor as
a comedy, though it did manage to make those who saw it feel profoundly
sorry for everyone involved in the production.  That kind of sympathy
isn't easy to elicit, and Hooper should be given some credit for getting
whole theaters full of people to blush and turn their heads away in
embarrassment.  It's an achievement that's not perhaps on the same level
as getting whole theaters full of people to laugh or cringe with terror,
but it's an achievement nonetheless.
     Unfortunately, getting whole theaters full of people to scratch
their heads, turn to their companions, and wonder aloud how such a
terrible film could ever have been made is not the way to establish
yourself as one of the masters of cinematic horror.  Although Craven has
had far more successes than has Tobe Hooper (whose goofy, nearly
nonsensical LIFEFORCE came to mind at several points during the
ludicrous goings on in Craven's film), he's also been rather uneven; for
every HILLS HAVE EYES and NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET, we seem to get an
equal number of films like SHOCKER, DEADLY BLESSING, DEADLY FRIEND
(which Leonard Maltin claims is the only movie ever made in which
someone is beheaded by a basketball) and his latest, THE PEOPLE UNDER
THE STAIRS.
     At his best and when working with a strong story, Wes Craven is
able to fashion small, self-contained worlds of terror, in which
ordinary people get caught up in extraordinary events.  His camera work,
sense of pacing, and visual flair are strikingly good -- especially in a
genre that provides employment to so many untalented hacks -- and even
films as dumb as SHOCKER or as bad as THE PEOPLE UNDER THE STAIRS look
terrific.  His films all have a rich, colorful texture that's rarely
seen in the generally flat and uninteresting horror product churned out
of Hollywood with dismaying regularity these days.  Oftentimes the way a
film looks and "feels" is as important as what's actually going on
onscreen; after all, David Lynch's classic ERASERHEAD manages to unnerve
nearly everyone who sees it, even though very very little actually
happens.  Sam Raimi's unsteady camera work and grainy film stock helped
make the audience for THE EVIL DEAD feel that things in that film were
somewhat out of control, and that Raimi wasn't going to feel bound by
the traditional agreement between directors and their audiences: that no
matter how gruesome or disturbing individual scenes may get, the film
will soon return to normality and another seven or eight minutes of
pointless dialogue and exposition.
     Alas, Craven's latest film looks great but feels like a week in bed
with the flu.  It may just be coincidence, but by the end of THE PEOPLE
UNDER THE STAIRS, the Phantom was feeling decidedly under the weather,
and since then he seems to be unable to shake a nagging headache and
occasional chills (notably absent during the film).  It could, of
course, be winter's first cold; on the other hand, it could also be the
first outward manifestation of the horror malaise that the Phantom has
been in the grip of since he saw CHILD'S PLAY 3 -- certainly none of the
horror films the Phantom has seen since had to work too hard to generate
headaches and occasional drowsiness.  Call it Chronic Disappointment
Syndrome, if you will.  The Phantom plans on taking some extra vitamin C
and staying in bed until CAPE FEAR opens next week, on the assumption
that Dr. Scorsese and his able assistant Dr. DeNiro will have a cure.
     There's a fundamental conceptual problem at the heart of THE PEOPLE
UNDER THE STAIRS: the notion that a crazy, sadistic couple could trap
and keep dozens of teenage boys in their basement, feed them with table
scraps and bits of the mailman, deprive each of them of their freedom,
their dignity and their humanity, and then have them just *live* there
and in the walls of their home like overgrown, bipedal rats, really puts
rather a strain on our credulity.  Oh, sure, they do give the boys
flashlights and a generous supply of replacement batteries -- and
goodness knows, that alone would keep the Phantom in someone's basement
for at least a week or two -- but after a few minutes, when we realize
that Craven doesn't intend these boys to be spirits or vampires or pets,
and that he really intends for us to buy this loopy premise, it becomes
painfully obvious that Craven won't be able to stop THE PEOPLE UNDER THE
STAIRS from turning into first a comedy of the absurd and then a
travesty of the inane.
     Even if we put aside the film's obvious logical flaws -- the
enormous and rather unlikely amount of space between the walls of the
house; the apparently huge interior of what from the outside appears to
be a very modest sized home; the football field-sized basement; the
ability of a small boy repeatedly to get in and out of a house from
which twenty or so other boys apparently cannot escape -- there's too
much about THE PEOPLE UNDER THE STAIRS that just doesn't make sense.
Why throw in the interminable nonsense about this couple being slumlords
who apparently own half the buildings in the "ghetto"?  What difference
does it make if the little boy and his family are going to be evicted?
Can Craven possibly believe that anyone in the audience actually cares
about these cardboard people?  The film spends a lot of time explaining
who this crazy couple is and what they're doing to the good folks in the
"ghetto", but to what end?  After all, it's likely that presenting these
people as child abusers and cannibals would be enough to get the
audience clamoring for their demise -- making them landlords on top of
everything else will certainly help whip the audience into a frenzy of
hatred, but it will likely do so at the expense of the story's suspense.
As is always the case with horror, too much explanation spoils the
broth, and with THE PEOPLE UNDER THE STAIRS, Craven makes the very
mistake he so neatly avoided in A NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET and THE HILLS
HAVE EYES: he spends much too long trying to explain who these people
are and why they're doing what they're doing.  No one really needed to
know Freddy's whole sordid history -- a few hints sufficed -- and
goodness knows the freakish family in the HILLS didn't require any
explanation at all.  The action and the terror spoke for themselves.
     But in THE PEOPLE UNDER THE STAIRS, Craven seems to have decided to
make a very nasty "movie of the week"; to that end, he apparently
further decided that his audience wouldn't be able to accept the rather
unlikely premise of the film if he didn't devote 30 minutes to the
after-school special-like story-within-a-story about the poor but brave
little black boy and his poor but deserving family.  Had this 30 minutes
all been concentrated at the beginning of the film, perhaps the Phantom
could advise his phans to arrive a half-hour late; alas, Craven has
carefully placed stop signs throughout his film so that whenever the
action or horror threatens to get too intense or the audience too
involved with the film, the plot quickly calls for another few minutes
of talk, talk, talk.  Phans who see this sad excuse for a horror film
are advised to rent the original ELM STREET film and view it with this
in mind -- they may be surprised and saddened to see how tightly focused
that film was, how little of the film's time and plot is wasted on
needless exposition, and how much more frightening Freddy is because the
film forgoes having a plot that does not directly involve him.  When
we're not with the kids in their dreams, we're in the real world where
all their efforts to get an adult to believe them fall on deaf ears.
The more they fail and the more Freddy succeeds at wiping out the entire
group of Elm Street kids, the more the suspense and terror in the film
builds; sadly, this is in marked contrast to the pacing and plot of THE
PEOPLE UNDER THE STAIRS, which limp along to an extremely phony climax
long after everyone in the audience has lost interest.
     This is not to say that a horror film can't having all the
trappings of a "movie of the week"; after all, THE STEPFATHER is an
excellent example of how a filmmaker can logically extend the endless
"brother against brother", "father against son", "mother against
daughter", "father against mother" movie "specials" that fill the
networks' after-dinner schedules.  But it's not a simple thing to do,
and a filmmaker who sets out to create a film like THE STEPFATHER would
be well-advised to heed the reasons that that film was a success:
excellent acting; a thoughtful script; and tight direction -- three of
the things that THE PEOPLE UNDER THE STAIRS unfortunately lacks.
     Horror films with unlikely premises can certainly succeed, and if
more care had been taken with THE PEOPLE UNDER THE STAIRS, it's unlikely
that anyone would notice or criticize its many logical flaws.  But since
the film is so badly done, so ineptly plotted, and so filled with scene
after scene of people talking, talking, talking, none of it works, and
the film's many flaws become all too apparent.  You know you've seen a
good horror film when you don't begin to wonder why the people in the
film did all the crazy, dangerous things they did until long after the
film has ended; likewise, you know you've seen a bad horror film when
you start wondering that almost before the first killing.  Let's just
say that the Phantom spent so much of his time during the film wondering
why nothing made any sense that by the time it was over he'd all but
forgotten how promising the film seemed as the opening credits rolled.
     Phans are well advised to steer clear of this turkey and hope that
Wes Craven will do something to make up for it with his next film.  One
bright note until then: no one need worry about THE PEOPLE UNDER THE
STAIRS II.

Title
Review for Misery (1990)
     A Stephen King novel is to literature what a Big Mac, a large
fries, and a Coke are to fine cuisine.  Both seem like good ideas when
you're hungry, and both taste great -- at least to start.  But after
you're done, you might feel vaguely dissatisfied, and at the very least
you'll have an awful lot of paper -- much of which is strewn with brand
names -- to dispose of.
     And yet, and yet.  Sure, you know pretty much what's going to
happen from the very first page.  And sure, the characters are
comfortable stereotypes, the settings are as familiar as the faithful
golden arches themselves, and the language is post-modern campfire-ese.
King even brings back characters and plot devices like Mickey D's brings
back McRibs: they're never gone long enough for us to really miss them.
     But still.  Can't get enough of 'em, right?  Neither can the
Phantom, who's been a King phan since early on, and has yet to read a
novel or short story that he didn't like -- at least a little.  For the
most part, though, he's liked them quite a lot, and he's always eager to
flex his eye muscles (and his biceps, given the physical -- if not
literary -- heft of King's recent efforts) on the latest from America's
favorite horror writer.
     An odd way to begin a review of MISERY, you might say.  But the
Phantom found as he left the theater that MISERY the film is a lot like
one of King's novels.  Although we never *should* be surprised by
anything that happens, we are.  And although James Caan gives a
perfunctory performance as Paul Sheldon, we're able to overlook it.  And
finally, although we must, as the credits roll, admit to ourselves that
MISERY really isn't much of a horror film, we must also admit that it
was, nonetheless, expertly made, beautifully photographed, and very,
very enjoyable.
     More than anyone else, Rob Reiner seems to have the best idea of
what a Stephen King novel *feels* like.  When he turned King's short
story, "The Body", into STAND BY ME, even non-King phans stood up and
took notice.  But those who *were* King phans, and who had suffered
through countless bad adaptations of his novels, rejoiced.  Here,
finally, was some relief from films like CAT'S EYE, and MAXIMUM
OVERDRIVE (especially MAXIMUM OVERDRIVE), CHRISTINE, GRAVEYARD SHIFT,
and even to some extent THE SHINING (which, while it is a fine horror
film in its own right, bears as much resemblance to a Stephen King novel
as Stephen King bears to a competent film director) -- films which bore
greater or lesser resemblance to the stories from which they were
adapted, but which *felt* nothing at all like them.  (Did the Phantom
mention MAXIMUM OVERDRIVE?)
     It's that feeling of familiarity, that feeling of settling down
around a campfire to hear a ripping good yarn -- and one that you know
will keep you awake until the wee hours of the night -- that is usually
missing from the films made out of King's novels and short stories.
Even THE SHINING, while technically excellent and quite scary enough,
was, however, coldly impersonal and distant -- just the opposite of
King's novel, which got you right inside the haunted Overlook and the
mind of its demented caretaker.
     But although horror may be neither Rob Reiner nor William Goldman's
forte, spinning ripping good yarns most certainly is.  The team who just
three years ago brought us the lightweight but entertaining PRINCESS
BRIDE have collaborated once again and produced the equally lightweight
(at least from a horror standpoint) but equally entertaining MISERY.
And when it comes down to it, after you strip away the blood and gore,
the evil clowns and giant spiders, the rabid dogs and 1950's space
aliens, a Stephen King novel sets out from the very first page to
entertain us.  And although it becomes apparent after only a half hour
that Rob Reiner doesn't really want to scare us very much, it's clear
from the very first frame that he wants to spin us a yarn -- he wants to
keep us entertained.
     In that, MISERY is a resounding success.  As a horror film, and as
an adaptation of one of King's best novels, it's somewhat of a mixed
bag.  The novel MISERY was entertaining, of course, and in many ways it
was a comfortable and familiar King novel, just like the dozens that had
preceded it (and presumably like the hundreds that would follow).  But
it was also a bit of a departure for King, for this novel had no band of
outcast kids; no ghosts or aliens or evil forces ; no apocalyptic battle
between the forces of good and evil; no cast of thousands.  Instead,
MISERY had just two main characters, locked for almost the entire novel
in a battle of wits, a battle which only one could survive.  MISERY is
King's most claustrophobic novel, and one of the most difficult horror
novels to read.  The sense of impending violence, doom, and insanity is
almost unbearable, and King puts us right in the room with his alter
ego, the horror novelist Paul Sheldon.  Sheldon, you see, makes the
mistake of getting into a near-fatal car accident and then getting
"rescued" by his "number one fan," Annie Wilkes, a woman who isn't quite
sane and who doesn't always make a lot of sense.  In other words, a
woman who would find herself quite at home in a Hollywood production
meeting.
     Annie is also a great phan of Misery Chastain, the heroine of
Sheldon's trashy romance novel series.  Although she sets out at first
to help Paul recuperate from his accident (though all the while
preventing him from leaving or getting in touch with anyone in the
outside world), she soon finishes reading his latest (and last) entry in
the "Misery" series.  And she discovers that Paul, in order to free
himself from the creation that had threatened to prevent him from
writing "serious" literature forever, had killed Misery off at the end
of the novel, thus hoping to put the series to rest once and for all.
     Unfortunately, the only thing Sheldon put to rest was any hope he
might have had of leaving Annie's secluded house before the spring thaw.
Upon finding that Paul killed her heroine -- her "perfect, perfect"
heroine -- Annie flies into a rage and nearly kills Paul before deciding
that instead of killing him he should redeem himself by writing a new
"Misery" novel and returning his most perfect of heroines to its adoring
public.  The rest of the novel is a tense, claustrophobic battle between
Paul and Annie, with enough violence sprinkled throughout to keep even
the most bloodthirsty of King's phans satisfied.
     But the emphasis of the novel, for all its descriptions of mangled
legs and kitchen knives, is on Paul and his desperate attempt to escape
from Annie.  In the process, King gets us inside the minds of both
characters, and as we begin to empathize with Paul, we begin to feel
more and more like we, too, are trapped in the bedroom, helplessly
awaiting Annie's next violent outburst.  That's one of the things that
makes MISERY so difficult to read, and one of the things that makes it a
little different from King's other novels.  Instead of shifting the
action and point of view between a dozen or so major characters, King
keeps the action, points of view, and story focused in that one bedroom,
and forces us to go through everything with Paul -- whether we want to
or not.
     And that's really the problem with MISERY, the film.  Although it
is quite faithful to the novel, and although Kathy Bates seems as born
to the role of Annie Wilkes as Anthony Perkins is to the role of Norman
Bates, Reiner never gets us to feel that same degree of terror and
claustrophobia; in fact, we don't even see things from Paul's point of
view with any degree of consistency.  Reiner opened MISERY up a little,
but as a result it seems that we spend nearly as much time with the
sheriff and his wife as we do with Paul and Annie.  It's almost as if
every time Reiner felt that the audience might be squirming a little
*too* much in their seats, he deliberately pulled back and eased up on
the tension.  In both the novel and the film, Annie is portrayed as
being quite insane, but Reiner makes her nearly as funny as she is
scary; on more than a few occasions, we get to laugh at her expense.
But it's laughter without a payoff, since we're laughing to escape from
whatever tension might have been building.  King never let us escape
that way, but except for two or three specific scenes, Reiner does.
     Another problem with MISERY is James Caan's performance.  It might
be a limitation of Goldman's script; it might be Reiner's direction; or
it might be Caan's inability to make us feel what his character is
feeling; but we, as the audience, never really begin to empathize with
Paul.  Oh sure, we all cringe when Annie threatens to hurt Paul, but
that's more a visceral reaction than true empathy.  What's missing from
MISERY is exactly what made HENRY so good: a performance like the one
that Michael Rooker gave, one that breaks down the barrier between
character and audience.  In HENRY, we felt for a brief while what being
a sociopathic killer was like; but in MISERY, we rarely, if at all, feel
what it must be like to be trapped in bed and held captive by a
madwoman.
     And yet, and yet.  Remember that the Phantom said that MISERY
really *felt* like a King novel?  Well it does, although sadly that
novel is not MISERY.  But for all its problems, MISERY is, like a good
King novel, completely captivating from beginning to end.  It forgoes
any chance of being a full-tilt horror film, but if it's seen neither as
a strict adaptation of King's novel nor a serious horror film, MISERY
works just fine.  It works for the same reason that many of King's
novels work: because it is out and out entertaining, regardless of
whatever problems an audience might have with it.
     Of course, MISERY isn't necessarily family entertainment, even
though the Phantom doesn't believe that it has its heart set on horror.
There are enough violent scenes to keep all but the most hard-core
horror phan -- or phan of the novel -- satisfied.  And when Reiner
decides to let Ms.  Bates loose, it is simply impossible to take your
eyes off the screen or your nails out of your mouth.  We're even willing
to forgive the old "Oh no!  The car's almost in the driveway" routines
and a pretty fair SLC quotient.  Reiner can be forgiven for this, since
as the Phantom has said, he's new to the horror game, and it's really
not his type of film.  On the other hand, his direction is always crisp
and the editing is first rate.  It's a tribute to Reiner's skill that he
can throw in tilted camera shots, shots of a full moon, thunder and
lightning just before something bad happens, and a dozen other tried and
true horror film cliches -- and make them all work (or at least keep us
from realizing that they're cliches until after the credits roll).  And
there are moments when it's obvious that he's gotten right into the
spirit of things; at least a half-dozen times throughout the film, it's
as if Reiner has forgotten that he just set out to spin an entertaining
yarn, rather than direct a full-tilt horror film.  On those occasions,
he gets the camera right up into Paul and Annie's (especially Annie's)
faces, and he really lets Kathy Bates go to town.  And for just a while
we are treated to some truly scary scenes.  But inevitably the scenes
end all too quickly, and usually without much of a payoff, and we're
back to MISERY: THE CAMPFIRE STORY rather than MISERY: THE HORROR FILM.
     So, phans, when it comes down to the final analysis, MISERY is
quite good, and it stands as one of the better adaptations of one of
King's novels (which isn't, of course, saying much), though it's really
not too much of a horror film itself.  But if you don't go into it
expecting the atmosphere that King labored so hard to create or the
tension and claustrophobia that pervaded his novel, the Phantom thinks
you'll find it well worth seeing.  In fact, it's worth seeing if for no
reason other than to see Kathy Bates' truly lunatic performance.
Lunatic performances are all too rare these days, and the Phantom thinks
that Bates' Annie Wilkes makes Chucky look like Charlie McCarthy in
comparison.  And that should be reason enough for a horror phan to check
out MISERY before it leaves the theaters and heads for a very
un-rightful resting place between copies of LIFEFORCE and MY BLOODY
VALENTINE on the horror shelves of Blockbusters nationwide.  It may not
be a great horror film, but it deserves *much* better company than that.
: The Phantom : baumgart@esquire.dpw.com :
{cmcl2,uunet}!esquire!baumgart

Title
Review for Guardian, The (1990)
     Well.  The Phantom must say that he has always been an admirer of the film
reviews in the New York Times; unlike the simple-minded thumbs who "review"
films on television, the Times' reviewers are critics in the best sense of the
word, and their reviews are always well considered and informative.
     So one can understand how flattered the Phantom felt when he read the lead
paragraph of Ms. Maslin's review.  Yet it behooves him to ask, "Now, who's
reading whose reviews here?"  Alas, if only the Phantom got Ms. Maslin's free
preview tickets, let alone her salary....  But for him it is enough to know
that he has found another phan on the staff of his favorite daily.
     Though clever, Maslin's lead paragraph is also very misleading.  To be
fair, the Phantom never expects accurate reviews of horror films from the
Times, but Maslin seems to have missed the point of THE GUARDIAN.  Like most
horror films, THE GUARDIAN doesn't exist to teach us a lesson (unless one
thinks that "Don't go in the basement" is a lesson).  Instead THE GUARDIAN
exists only to entertain and to scare us, and in that capacity it does a very
good job indeed.
     So let's start with a brief summary.  THE GUARDIAN is yet another in a
long line of mainstream "adult" horror films.  Like THE EXORCIST (also by the
director, William Friedkin), THE OMEN, and more recently, CHILD'S PLAY, THE
GUARDIAN is a horror film designed to appeal to those people who would not
otherwise go to a horror film.  And while it's not nearly as successful THE
EXORCIST or THE OMEN, it works about as well as CHILD'S PLAY (though whether it
does as well at the box office remains to be seen) -- in other words, it's not
a classic, but it's pretty good in it's own way.
     The story is fairly simple, if a tad unusual.  Imagine, if you will, that
the Druids were right -- that trees really do have spirits and can exert
influence over people and the world around them.  Now imagine that one of these
Druids is also a nanny.  Still with me?  OK, now to complete our mental
picture, imagine that one of the trees -- an *evil* tree -- demands human
sacrifices, particularly *infant* sacrifices.
     Certainly by its very nature, THE GUARDIAN gives THE FIRST POWER a run for
its money as this year's silliest horror film.  But although it sounds fairly
outlandish, once you buy the premise, THE GUARDIAN is a lot of fun.  Unlike THE
FIRST POWER, THE GUARDIAN starts out silly and stays that way -- in general,
the Phantom prefers films that work like this, rather than ones like THE FIRST
POWER, that start out sensible and promising and end up in a big muddle.
     THE GUARDIAN begins with a bit of explanation -- it seems that the
producers don't believe that their audience would understand what Druids are
without three or four screens worth of explanation.  Unfortunately, the
preamble reminded the Phantom of nothing less than a cross between the
Stonehenge sequence from THIS IS SPINAL TAP and the disclaimer at the beginning
of SCARFACE.  Briefly, the producers want to be sure that everyone understands
that the Druids were an ancient religious sect that worshipped trees, and that
while most Druids (and, presumably, most trees) are fine, upstanding members of
their communities and/or forests, some are just bad seeds -- real rotten apples
-- trees and disciples that have gone over to the Dark Side.  The Phantom
apologizes in advance if he didn't get this part exactly right, but he thinks
that this was the general idea.  Why these trees are evil is never explained --
perhaps they're tired of being turned into press releases and fax paper, or
maybe they've been cheated out of their residuals for THE WIZARD OF OZ -- but
honestly, neither the Phantom nor the twelve-year-olds he was surrounded by
required further explanation.  Evil trees?  No problem!  Once you buy into
pizza-eating turtles and stunt-nuns, your tolerance for cinematic silliness
goes way up.
     Now, the Phantom would normally take some time here to further describe
the plot, but in this case it's hardly necessary, and in fact it might possibly
spoil the film for some.  THE GUARDIAN is not a film that is loaded with
surprises, so the Phantom would feel worse than usual if he gave some of them
away.
     Disappointed?  Oh, all right then, let's give some of them away anyway.
Here goes.  Couple hires nanny, nanny cares for infant, nanny communes with
evil tree, nanny takes infant, couple chases nanny -- you get the idea.
Surprised?
     Well, surprisingly, there *are* some surprises.  For one, there are
several OMEN-like killings done with 90s-style special effects and gore.  For
another, the film doesn't plod along in TV movie-of- the-week fashion -- the
editing, camera work and cinematography are all top-notch.  Friedkin hasn't
lost his touch since his days of directing Linda Blair amidst buckets of pea
soup: THE GUARDIAN looks and feels a lot like the EXORCIST did, and the Phantom
enjoyed that expert look and feel more than he did almost anything else about
the film.  The Phantom was particularly disappointed with Maslin's review in
this respect: she complains that Friedkin concentrates too much on "things
decorative" and sets up shots in forests and meadows so that "viewers are apt
to notice wildflowers in the foreground."  Oh dear.  Isn't that the point?
This film *is*, after all, about evil Druids, so one would think that placing
the characters in the context of the wildlife surrounding them would be
important.  Much better this than the relatively uninspired camera work of THE
FIRST POWER, to pick on our favorite silly horror film yet again.
     For film buffs, Friedkin has also scattered several "inside" references
throughout THE GUARDIAN -- the Phantom caught at least three -- and as the film
progresses it also becomes obvious that Friedkin is nearly as big a phan of
EVIL DEAD as is the Phantom himself (the "basement" scene in particular is
strikingly reminiscent of one of the scenes in EVIL DEAD).  Phans who want the
inside track should pay particularly close attention to the radio programs that
are "overheard" on occasion.
     And those who are not into gore for gore's sake may want to consider
playing peek-a-boo during some scenes; the Phantom himself was surprised at how
far some of the violence went, especially given the supposed "mainstream"
nature of this film.  Unlike, say, HELLBOUND, which was never intended to
appeal to non-horror phans, THE GUARDIAN appears on the surface to have been
designed to appeal to people who don't normally appreciate a good
dismemberment.  To be fair, it never gets nearly as bad as HELLBOUND -- in
fact, the gore-level is about on a par with one of the OMEN sequels (though
nary a priest is wrapped in plastic and set on fire) -- but there are a few
scenes that would do Romero proud.  These trees don't kill people by dropping
acorns on their heads, you know...
     The acting is adequate (with the exception of Jenny Seagrove, whose
performance as the evil nanny is not in the least wooden*), and baby Jake is
definitely cute, even though he is portrayed at times by (in Maslin's words) "a
screaming pile of towels."  The special effects are generally well done, and
although Friedkin seems to have used the same backlot forest that was featured
in LEATHERFACE last year, the meadows are scenic and the film does its best to
imbue what are, after all, just a bunch of plants with evil and ill-meaning
intentions.
     The Phantom really recommends this one, phans; despite its astoundingly
silly plot, and despite some of the negative reviews it has garnered, THE
GUARDIAN is a good, solid 90 minutes of fun with enough scares to keep even the
most jaded horror-film buff on his toes.  It's worth catching before it makes
its Blockbusters debut.
*Yes, all right, that one was a bit of a stretch.  Just be glad the
 Phantom couldn't come up with a good pun for "druid."

Title
Review for Class of 1999 (1990)
     Though the Phantom usually apologizes for taking longer than a few
days in getting his reviews to his phans, in this case no apology is
really needed, since the Phantom, in a departure from his usual verbose
style, is going to advise his phans up front to sit out Mark Lester's
somewhat entertaining but rather lame sequel to his 1982 cult favorite,
CLASS OF 1984, or at least wait for its Blockbusters debut in a few
months.  (Now imagine that sentence had the Phantom *not* departed from
his usual verbose style.)
     For those phans not familiar with Lester's earlier work, CLASS OF
1984 was intended to be an updating of the schoolroom chaos classic THE
BLACKBOARD JUNGLE.  The idea was much the same -- a naive teacher comes
to a troubled inner city school and is forced to contend with a gang of
thugs who do everything they can to discourage him from teaching.
Sadly, BLACKBOARD JUNGLE seems fairly tame and dated by our contemporary
standards, and it is no doubt for this reason that Lester went to great
lengths to make things in CLASS OF 1984 just a little more outrageous
than the reality of even the most troubled school.  Yes, many city
schools now force students to submit to metal detectors, but at least
there aren't many yet where teachers are threatened with axes, or where
students are pushed into buzz saws, or where teachers go berserk and
teach their biology classes at gunpoint.  At least not yet (though had
someone suggested the possibility of teaching at gunpoint to a certain
frustrated high school chemistry teacher the Phantom remembers, chances
are the teacher would at least have raised the possibility with the
school board and teachers' union).
     CLASS OF 1984 wasn't a great film, but it was a lot of fun.  One
reason for its success is the shear obviousness of its plot.  It's
something so familiar and comfortable to us -- we know just how the
entire film will progress, we know that there won't be any unpleasant
and surprising plot twists, and we know that if we decide to watch our
microwave popcorn for the whole four minutes, we really won't miss that
much.  We've seen it all before, but while obviousness is a serious
drawback in other genres, it is sometimes a distinct plus when it comes
to horror films.  Why else do we so eagerly await each of Freddy,
Michael, and Jason's new installments?  Of course we know that the
teacher will win out in the end, and of course we know that all those
awful students will get just what they deserve before the credits roll.
To be fair, Timothy Van Patten also had a lot to do with CLASS OF 1984's
success: his over-the-top performance as a combination sociopath and
accomplished but frustrated pianist added a spark of life (and more than
a little camp) to what otherwise might have been an ordinary,
run-of-the-mill revenge film.  And seeing Michael "I haven't added the
'J' yet" Fox play a frightened freshmen is alone worth the price of
admission; his incredibly melodramatic "performance" in this cheap
exploitation flick is likely to be a little further back to the future
than he would care to remember at this point in his career.
     Lester's latest, CLASS OF 1999, isn't exactly a sequel, since all
the bad guys get theirs at the end of CLASS OF 1984; instead, it's more
like a spinoff.  And in this season of high concept horror films, CLASS
OF 1999 is no exception.  The high concept pitch?  "OK, imagine ROBOCOP
meets THE TERMINATOR, but with teachers, not cops.  Things get so bad in
the schools they have to hire androids to teach, but they lose control
of them and..."  The Phantom was disappointed that the print ads didn't
feature an original slogan like "Meet the future of classroom
instruction," though perhaps the fear of litigation stifled the
producers' creative impulses.
     But like many high concept films, CLASS OF 1999 suffers from a
distinct lack focus.  It starts in the same vein as ROBOCOP, complete
with a bleak vision of the future, a future where most schools are
declared free-fire zones, students are asked to check their automatic
weapons at the door (to be picked up after school ends), and the
government agency charged with educating our nation's youth is the
Department of Educational Defense.  The joke here is that the students
have made it so difficult for average teachers (i.e., human teachers) to
teach that the Department and the school board of a beleaguered Seattle
school resort to extreme measures: they decide to try using experimental
androids to teach classes and restore order in the school.  Since the
androids look human enough (well, human enough to pass for teachers,
anyway), the students don't realize what's happening until it's too
late.
     Had Lester stuck with this theme (as Paul Verhoeven did with
ROBOCOP), he might have had something here; alas, Lester is no
Verhoeven.  Instead, he chickens out and turns CLASS OF 1999 into a
TERMINATOR clone about half way through.  Unfortunately, although both
ROBOCOP and THE TERMINATOR deal with future technology and specifically
with androids and how they interact with people, they're fundamentally
different films.  It would have made no sense for Peter Weller to
suddenly lose his mind and start killing innocent people, just as it
would have made no sense for Schwarzenegger (had to look that one up,
phans -- the Phantom can never remember how many Z's go on the marquee)
to fall in love; to their credit, neither Verhoeven nor Cameron stray
from the single point of focus in their respective films -- that's what
makes them great directors.  Lester, however, is basically a hack, and
he makes the mistake of assuming that if one idea is good, then two are
even better (the Phantom hereby dubs this "THE FIRST POWER syndrome," in
honor of one of the silliest and most overplotted horror films in recent
memory).
     There was an echo of CLASS OF 1999 in CLASS OF 1984, when toward
the end Malcolm McDowell, who played a burnt-out and hard-drinking
biology teacher, finally cracks after Timothy Van Patten and pals kill
his laboratory animals (and specifically put his favorite lab rabbit on
a rotisserie, FATAL ATTRACTION-style).  McDowell is found holding a gun
on his biology class, forcing them to learn or die.
     Without a doubt, there is something undeniably funny about a
biology teacher holding a .32 to a student's head and asking her how
many chambers the human heart has -- "Come on now, you know this!  It's
very important that you try to remember..."  But instead of expanding on
this idea (furthering the already outrageous joke by making the teachers
inhuman robots), Lester decides to go the TERMINATOR route and turn
CLASS OF 1999 into a bad remake of that hunt-and-destroy classic.  The
teachers, you see, are really army-surplus, and the unscrupulous head of
MegaTech (played by Stacy Keach with a white mane of hair and Star
Trek-style contacts in his eyes) knows that with a little reprogramming
he can pass them off as fully certified classroom instruction units.
But Keach has a hidden agenda: he knows that once the "teachers" get a
taste of corporal punishment, they'll begin to revert back to their
original purpose, and he finally be able to prove to the army how
effective they are in combat.
     That's really much too much story for such a simple-minded film,
and though there are dozens of great scenes and lots of great ideas
scattered through, CLASS OF 1999 just can't support all that plot.
Instead, it winds up as another candidate for our ever-expanding
"half-film festival."  Lester would have been better advised to stick to
the successful formula of CLASS OF 1984 -- the kind of formula that
makes Troma films (like the TOXIC AVENGER series) so enjoyable -- rather
than try to take a stab at creating a fully realized future world that's
part ROAD WARRIOR, part ROBOCOP, part TERMINATOR, but only partly
successful.
     Still, how can you not enjoy seeing an android teacher approach an
unruly student and go through a menu of possible responses in his
heads-up display [ (1) educate, (2) reprimand, (3) discipline ]?  And
how can you help but enjoy the little throwaway touches throughout the
film (like the Orwellian electronic signs in the school, urging the
students to "LEARN" and "OBEY")?  And to the film's credit, the creature
and robot effects are quite good -- at least as good as the effects in
the similarly budgeted TERMINATOR.
     But in the end, all the individual parts just don't add up to one
coherent whole.  Every time we think that Lester has finally found his
voice, he pulls the rug out from under us and changes the tone of the
film once again (usually for the worse).  By the film's end, we're just
biding our time until the teachers can all be exterminated by the rival
gangs of students (who have, in a wonderful moment of classic film
cliche, shook hands and joined to fight their common enemy).  And we do
this only because Lester holds out the promise of a TERMINATOR-style
ending -- one promise that he does, in fact, deliver on.
     With ROBOCOP 2 and TOTAL RECALL arriving in the theaters shortly,
there's not much point in seeing CLASS OF 1999; in just a few weeks,
it'll all be done better, with better special effects, with higher
budgets, and with tee-shirts and Burger King glasses galore.  But CLASS
OF 1999 is worth seeing once the hoopla of the summer's releases fade
and fall is once again upon us.
     On the bright side, remember that it did take Lester eight years to
bring forth this sub-par sequel to his cultish CLASS OF 1984; if he
keeps to this pace, the Phantom won't have to review CLASS OF 2001
(complete with gorillas, space stations, and a tall, black chalkboard
that hums) for a good long time.

Title
Review for Silence of the Lambs, The (1991)
     The Phantom has always wanted to do a TV-style two-word review,
suitable for prominent display on a theater marquee.  So how about,
"'SILENCE' IS GOLDEN!"  Truly, the Phantom feels like Roger Ebert
already.  But in fairness, Jonathan Demme's new thriller, based on the
novel by Thomas Harris, is a knockout, better even than the Phantom
himself had hoped for.
     Good reviews are always the most difficult kind for the Phantom to
write; it's as difficult to be clever when the Phantom is praising
something as it is for him to be fair when he's casting another horrible
horror film to the wolves.  Reviewing a turkey like POPCORN was easy;
reviewing SILENCE will be much more difficult.  But let's give it a try,
starting with the script, based on Thomas Harris' excellent
psychological thriller.  Harris does psychological thrillers about as
well as anyone, and in THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS he brought back one of
his most memorable characters, Dr. Hannibal Lecter, the brilliant but
insane psychiatrist who we first met in RED DRAGON (which was also
turned into a fine, though largely overlooked, film called MANHUNTER by
the talented and stylish director of Miami Vice fame, Michael Mann).
     Dr. Lecter has the knack of getting inside of people's heads --
and also the rest of their bodies; he wasn't nicknamed "Hannibal the
Cannibal" for nothing.  Although Lecter was not the focus of RED DRAGON,
SILENCE spends most of its time exploring him and his relationship to
Clarice Starling, a young FBI trainee sent to get Lecter to help an
investigation into a series of brutal murders by someone the press has
dubbed "Buffalo Bill."  Harris' novel spent about as much time with
Lecter as it did with Buffalo Bill, and in turning it into a film,
Demme's decision to concentrate on Lecter and relegate the scenes
involving Bill to the obligatory "final confrontation" at the film's end
is an inspired one.  Adapting any novel is difficult, if only because it
involves reducing what might be a week's worth of entertainment for the
average reader to a script which can fit comfortably inside of two
hours.  But it's even more difficult when the novel spends so much time
with three very compelling characters.  Given the need to distill
Harris' novel down to its essence and yet make SILENCE more than just
another run-of-the-mill thriller, Demme chooses to use Buffalo Bill more
as a convenient excuse than as a character; although he doesn't ignore
Bill altogether, he exists as little more than the subject of Lecter and
Starling's conversations -- and the reason they keep having
conversations -- until quite near the very end of the film.
     Had Demme had lesser actors with which to work, or had Harris'
novel been less literate and more exploitative than it was, this
decision might well have backfired, since it forces a change in tone --
from exciting manhunt to scenes of static conversation -- that is risky
at best.  When Michael Mann directed MANHUNTER, he chose to make a
straightforward adaptation of Harris' RED DRAGON.  In the process, he
created a gripping, scary, and effective thriller, but at some level it
differed little from the hundreds of other thrillers that had come
before it.  In that film, an FBI investigator is recalled to help track
a serial killer because the FBI knows that he has a knack for thinking
like the sociopaths he tracks.  Harris spent more time on this theme
than did Mann, and as a consequence MANHUNTER is a much more ordinary
thriller than is SILENCE.  This is not to say that MANHUNTER isn't worth
seeing or that it's boring or predictable; on the contrary, Mann
fashioned a supremely enjoyable and stylish film from Harris' very good
source material.  But the focus of that film was very much on the hunt;
although Mann spends some time exploring what it means to be able to
think like a serial killer, the theme is largely discarded once the film
gets going and Mann gets into the heat of the chase.
     Demme, however, very nearly discards the heat of the chase in favor
of what might be called a very warped MY DINNER WITH ANDRE.  Realizing
that in Jodie Foster and Anthony Hopkins he had two exceptional actors,
Demme opts to concentrate on their relationship.  And from the very
first meeting, it's obvious that he made the right choice.  Stories
involving pretty young investigators and brutal killers are nearly as
common in the theaters as they are on television; but thrillers that put
a camera motionless in a cell and record the conversations between
someone as intense as Hannibal Lecter and someone as determined as
Clarice Starling are rare to the point of nonexistence.  It occurred to
the Phantom that not since John McNaughton's HENRY: PORTRAIT OF A SERIAL
KILLER has a filmmaker had the talent and the courage to assume that his
audience wasn't full of drooling PREDATOR 2 fans (though the Phantom has
yet to meet one, he assumes that they must exist somewhere).  To do what
he did, Demme had to assume instead that there were real, thinking
people out there who would find the tension in the scenes between Lecter
and Starling as intense and scary as any standard issue "killer stalking
helpless woman through dark basement" scene.  Of course, in the end
Demme does hedge his bets a bit, but by the time the film changes its
focus to Buffalo Bill, everyone in the audience feels lucky to have been
able to spend some time with Hannibal and Clarice.
     Of course, the best script in the world won't help a film if its
actors have less range than their guns.  Fortunately, both Jodie Foster
and Anthony Hopkins give all-out performances that are exactly right for
what Demme wants to do with the film.  When the Phantom first read
Harris' novel, he didn't have clear mental pictures of either Clarice
Starling or Hannibal Lecter; now that he's seen the film, however, it
will be as difficult to picture them as anyone other than Foster and
Hopkins as it is to picture anyone other than Alec Guinness as George
Smiley when reading John Le Carre's novels.  Jodie Foster has the
toughest job of it, which is why her performance is so much more
impressive.  Starling's role throughout the story is very reactive, and
she spends much of the film providing a foil for Lecter.  But although
much of her character development is excised in the film, Foster gives
Clarice Starling real substance, and she manages to make Starling not
just sympathetic, but a real person to whom the audience has no trouble
relating.
     Anthony Hopkins, on the other hand, gives a truly brilliant and
captivating performance as Hannibal Lecter, one that is every bit as
good as Jodie Foster's; it is as much to his credit as it is to Harris'
that by the end of the film we feel we "know" Lecter and maybe even like
him a little bit.  Hopkins stares at Clarice -- and at us -- with a
hunger and an intensity that's more than a little unsettling.  As Harris
wrote the character, Lecter is supposed to be incredibly smart, fast and
cool, and Hopkins' Lecter more than lives up to Harris' description.  He
always looks to us like a coiled spring or an brilliant and
self-possessed snake, ready to strike at the first opportunity.  And
when Demme gets the camera right up into Hopkins' face, we see what
Clarice sees -- the slicked back hair, the expressionless face, the dead
and unblinking eyes -- and we feel what she feels: that perhaps the
thick, bulletproof plastic separating her from Lecter might not be as
effective as it first seems.  From the very first moments of their first
meeting, Lecter gets both Starling and the audience under his spell, and
whenever the film returns to Lecter, all thoughts of the rest of the
plot or even of any other characters melt away as we become completely
absorbed in Hopkins' performance.
     That, however, also points out a problem with the film, for as much
as we would like to linger with Lecter and Starling and learn more about
what makes each of them tick, Demme must inevitably return to what is,
after all, the film's plot.  Demme is able to pull off these shifts
between Lecter and the investigation (using Starling as the link between
them) until the film's end, at which time he becomes a prisoner of the
need to resolve everything one way or another.  As unusual as SILENCE is
as a thriller, it is ultimately a mass-market Hollywood film -- once all
is said and done, SILENCE is not another HENRY.  But the need to return
to Buffalo Bill and to provide the film with a satisfactory resolution
is but a minor problem, and one that we only notice because the film up
until that point had been so exceptional.  In MANHUNTER, such resolution
seemed perfectly in character, since the film is really about a manhunt;
but in SILENCE, the 20 or 30 minutes that Demme needs to force-feed us
the shaky plot points and fairly incredible coincidences and
contrivances necessary to end the film seems like time stolen from the
wonderful, intriguing, and startling Hannibal Lecter -- and from Anthony
Hopkins' show-stopping performance.
     But that is truly a minor nit to pick.  On the whole, SILENCE
succeeds both as an adaptation of a well-known and widely-read novel and
as a film in its own right.  In fact, it's not clear to the Phantom who
will enjoy SILENCE more: people who have read the novel or people who
haven't.  Although the former may enjoy the last half of the film more
than the latter -- if only because they won't have to rely on the
overly-rushed explanations and the too-brief character sketch of Buffalo
Bill -- they will also be at a disadvantage in knowing what to expect
from Dr. Lecter.  People who see the film first will be going in cold
and will be able to enjoy both Hopkins' and Foster's performances
without any preconceived ideas or expectations.  In any event, at the
performance the Phantom attended, it seemed that none of the seven or
eight hundred people in the audience was disappointed with the film, and
more than a few gave it a round of applause as the credits rolled.  The
Phantom himself looks forward to seeing it again in the coming weeks; as
much as he enjoyed Harris' novel, he thinks he enjoyed Hopkins'
performance even more.
     What more is there to say?  The film is simply excellent and well
worth seeing.  For phans who haven't yet read Harris' novel, the Phantom
recommends that they first see the film, then wait a while and give the
novel a try.  But if you've already read the novel, see the film anyway,
if only to enjoy the film's beautiful and stylish look, Demme's tight
and effective direction, and of course Foster and Hopkins' stellar
performances.  SILENCE is a film to be savored, a true rarity: an "A"
picture in a "B" movie genre.

Title
Review for Henry: Portrait of a Serial Killer (1986)
     The Phantom can't remember the last time he was forced to suffer so much
for his chosen profession.  Not that HENRY: PORTRAIT OF A SERIAL KILLER was
bad; on the contrary, it was one of the best horror films -- or films of any
kind -- he's seen in a while.
     But HENRY's not your average horror film.  No, HENRY wasn't made for the
misfits and members of the raincoat set who share the Times Square auditoriums
that the Phantom frequents.  It actually has artistic pretensions (so much so
that the Village Voice, in a review typical of its contemplative, restrained
style, called it "the best movie of the year").  So instead of opening next to
NINJA DOMINATRIX and a revival of MAKE THEM DIE SLOWLY, HENRY opened in New
York at an art house in Soho.
     To be perfectly frank, the Phantom much prefers the company of the kindred
spirits who flock to each of Michael, Jason, and Freddy's features.  At least
then he isn't the only person in the auditorium who isn't dressed in black.  At
least then he isn't surrounded by hoards of pretentious, espresso-sipping,
Canby-wannabees.  And at least then he isn't forced to associate with people
who ask "Is that real butter?" and then decide not to get the popcorn when
they find out it isn't.  
     But here the Phantom is getting caught up in his own private hell,
something with which his faithful phans should not concern themselves (though
supportive email and expressions of sympathy are always welcome).
     Let us instead get to the point: HENRY is a great film.  For a film that
was supposed to be nothing more than a run-of-the-mill slash and trash flick,
HENRY is surprisingly good.  The director, John McNaughton, had in mind more
than just Blockbuster fodder, and with HENRY he succeeds in presenting a
complete artistic vision -- a view from inside of a sociopathic killer.
     Ironically enough, we have our own very much under-appreciated board of
censors, the MPAA, to thank in part for HENRY's artistic success.  For had they
not deemed HENRY unviewable by the nation's teenagers (it was originally given
an X rating), it might well have been released and promoted as nothing more
than another in a long line of slice-and-dice epics.  And had that happened, a
lot of people would have missed out on a stunningly good film, since most
mainstream film-goers studiously avoid the genre.
     The plot is quite simple: HENRY was "inspired" by the story of Henry Lee
Lucas, a mass murderer now on Death Row in Texas.  Henry confessed to murdering
hundreds of people, including his mother, but later retracted his confession
and claimed that he murdered his mother only.  The real-life Henry also had a
friend named Otis, who he accused of participating in his crimes, and Otis had
a niece named Becky who the police believe was among Henry's victims.
     McNaughton uses this story as a starting point for HENRY, and though the
title might lead one to believe that HENRY is another THIN BLUE LINE, a message
at the beginning of the film states that the story portrayed is purely
fictional.  It could only be this way, of course, for otherwise McNaughton
would have had to rely on the very unreliable testimony of a sociopath awaiting
execution.
     The film itself looks and feels as empty as Henry's soul, and there is
very little dialogue.  As a film, HENRY exists as a tribute to cinematic
technique, and the film works only because McNaughton does not judge nor even
pretend to understand Henry.  Phans should not go expecting pat answers,
armchair psychology, or movie-of-the-week morals.  Even the scene in which
Henry relates the circumstances surrounding the murder of his mother does
nothing to illuminate Henry's motives; worse, its outcome completely confounds
our expectations.  To McNaughton's credit, that one quiet scene visibly
unsettled the audience more than did all of the film's graphic violence.
     In many ways HENRY reminded the Phantom of BLOOD SIMPLE, but it seemed
closer still to STRANGER THAN PARADISE in that the film had a disjointed, empty
feeling that nonetheless was exactly right in tone.  HENRY is also reminiscent
of SEX LIES AND VIDEOTAPE; McNaughton uses many of the same techniques as did
Steven Soderbergh, though while Soderbergh wanted us to feel somewhat ambiguous
about sex, McNaughton wants us to feel somewhat ambiguous about mass murder.
Shockingly enough, he succeeds.
     Michael Rooker (who has previously acted in EIGHT MEN OUT and SEA OF LOVE)
turns in a stellar performance as Henry.  If you catch yourself empathizing
with HENRY, or if you find yourself understanding and agreeing with some of the
things he says, Rooker's performance is the reason why.  The Phantom cannot
think of a less sympathetic character; by comparison, it was easy to empathize
with DeNiro in TAXI DRIVER.  Even Michael and Jason, cartoon characters that
they are, are more human than Henry, for at least they have, in their many
sequels, expressed some human emotion.  But Henry is a true sociopath and so
exists in a realm of existence beyond our comprehension.  Rooker turns in a
performance that in a just world should win him an Oscar; it's a shame that he
won't even be nominated.
     What more can the Phantom say?  In its review, The Voice was not too far
off.  Though the Phantom would hesitate to call HENRY the best film of the
year, it will almost certainly rank in his top 10 by December.  
     Unfortunately for his phans, though, HENRY is currently only in very
limited release.  Worse, the film is unrated (better that than accept our
national censor's stamp of disapproval), and so it will never be shown in a
good number of movie theaters across this great, enlightened land of ours.
     So, phans, will you ever be able to see it?  The Phantom's guess is that
most of his phans will have to wait and see if it hits Blockbuster's catalog in
the coming months -- truly a shame, in the Phantom's opinion, since he knows
how much of a film's impact is lost on a small screen.  But even if you have to
wait for its videotape debut, make a special note to see HENRY, a film as
disturbing as it is excellent and as thought-provoking as it is stylish.  In
short, HENRY is a film that no horror phan -- or serious phan of the cinema --
will want to miss.

Title
Review for Borrower, The (1991)
     The Phantom returned to the Angelika theater last Saturday night
for a midnight showing of John McNaughton's latest horror film, THE
BORROWER.  Long-time readers will remember the Phantom's prior
spine-tingling encounter with SoHo's premiere theater for the
all-in-black set, and it was with some reluctance that the Phantom
decided to return for THE BORROWER.  Alas, this horror/comedy gem can be
seen in New York City only at the Angelika, and only at midnight; but
given how taken the Phantom was last year with McNaughton's horror
classic HENRY: PORTRAIT OF A SERIAL KILLER, and how much he enjoyed
McNaughton's direction of Eric Bogosian's one-man show, SEX, DRUGS AND
ROCK & ROLL (currently in limited theatrical release), the Phantom felt
it was worth braving the espresso, the cappuccino, and the black leather
so that he could see what Mr. McNaughton has in store for
quality-starved horror phans.
     Still dazed from his last encounter with the Angelika (at which
time he was horrified to overhear someone decline the popcorn because it
wasn't topped with real butter), the Phantom decided that this time he
would try to blend in as best he could.  To that end he dressed himself
in black jeans, black running shoes, a black leather jacket and a black
Boxhill Systems t-shirt.  He also ordered a cup of coffee -- black --
when he arrived, and put all thoughts of real movie theater food out of
his mind.  To complete his camouflage, he was also joined at the last
moment by four friends, all of whom were themselves black, though most
of whom were probably grievously misled into attending -- after all, the
number of people who will willingly attend a film that features giant
bugs, exploding heads, and Rae Dawn Chong are few and far between.  But
knowing how ill at ease he would be sitting there among the
foreign-film-aholics, they came to the Phantom's rescue and kept him
from buying popcorn with the express intent of throwing it at the first
"film enthusiast" who loudly expounded on the declining state of the
American cinema and explained to anyone within earshot why LA FEMME
NIKITA was really so much more than a movie about a pretty girl with
long legs who shoots people.  It's an allegory, or so the Phantom has
been -- unwillingly -- told.
     Still, the Phantom appreciated their company, and as the opening
credits rolled, he attempted to reassure them with one of his
long-standing horror maxims: that any movie with giant bugs, exploding
heads, and Rae Dawn Chong can't be all bad.  And as it turned out, THE
BORROWER wasn't bad at all, though it's certainly not in the same league
as HENRY.  In fact, THE BORROWER is really more a horror comedy than a
serious horror film, and although it contains a reasonable amount of
gore, it's not an over-the-top gore-fest like REANIMATOR or EVIL DEAD 2.
But the deadpan style is much the same, and to their credit McNaughton
and everyone else play it straight; as a result, THE BORROWER is rather
like the NAKED GUN of horror films.
     The story is a simple one: an alien is sentenced to live out the
remainder of his life as a human being (obviously the result of a
misdemeanor crime -- if it were a felony conviction the alien would be
sentenced to live out his life as a film producer) on the planet Earth.
Although he is initially given a human form, he's warned that any damage
done to his body might result in a partial transformation back to his
original form -- which, by the way, bears more than a passing
resemblance to James Earl Jones dressed as a giant locust in EXORCIST
II: THE HERETIC.  Homage or coincidence?  You decide.
     As is typical with these sorts of situations, such a transformation
frequently results in the need for additional human body parts (to
replace the damaged ones).  Not realizing that most people are attached
to their heads and arms and tend not to want to hand them out on loan,
the alien finds that every so often he must, well, borrow a spare head
from someone if he is to go on living.
     This alone might be considered ludicrous, but McNaughton is nothing
if not relentlessly logical.  In addition to borrowing a head or two,
the alien must also eat part of his victim, presumably so the rather
complicated skin grafts will take.
     So.  Spare body parts, cannibalism, giant bugs.  If THE BORROWER
had only this -- and nothing more -- to offer horror phans, it would
hardly be worth seeing; after all, one could always stop by one's local
Blockbusters and rent DAWN OF THE DEAD or REANIMATOR.  But in what may
well be the casting coup of the year, McNaughton gives us Rae Dawn Chong
as an upscale police woman without a social life who manages to stumble
onto the film's terrible secret after an astonishingly short 90 minutes
of police work.  (As an extra, added attraction, he also gives us
Antonio Fargas as something other than a pimp -- he plays a homeless
man, but for Fargas that's a career move.)
     Ms. Chong puts her all into this film -- perhaps aware that her
reputation as the Linda Blair of the nineties could be at stake -- and
the Phantom is pleased to report that she does not disappoint.  Her
acting range is, if anything, even more limited than Blair's at the
height of her career; after all, Ms. Chong has never had to star in any
"women in prison" films, the Shakespearean tragedies of the B-movie
world.  What's more, her near-perfectly blank expression and her flat,
uninflected delivery reminded the Phantom at times of -- dare he say it?
-- Bo.  Both Blair and Chong have a long way to go before they can even
be considered in the same league as Ms. Derek, and for now Bo's role as
Jane in TARZAN, THE APE MAN remains unchallenged as the very pinnacle of
bad acting.  For now.  Should Ms. Chong ever decide to star in QUEST
FOR FIRE II, however, the movie world will probably have to give her the
nod, since Bo has effectively retired from competition with an
undisputed title.
     There are decently cheesy special effects (some might include Chong
in this category), lots of good lines (none of which the Phantom will
spoil here) and sundry gross-outs, the best of which involves an effect
that reportedly cost upwards of $1.98, proving once again that it
doesn't take money to make an audience sick to its stomach, just talent.
We're also treated to two very good performances: one by Tom Towles as
the country yokel who first discovers the alien (and a short time later
as the alien himself), and the other by Pam Gordon who plays a coroner
who always seems just a little too enthusiastic about her work.  Phans
of HENRY will remember Towles as Henry's partner in crime, and while his
performance here is much less serious, it's no less effective.  They
should also be on the lookout for a couple of inside references to the
film.
     Phans of the horror film THE HIDDEN will notice certain
similarities between it and THE BORROWER; the Phantom doesn't know how
intentional those similarities are supposed to be, though he believes
that its just a case of two good directors getting some mileage out of
one good idea.  The stories are similar, but McNaughton plays it more
for laughs, and ultimately THE BORROWER winds up borrowing just as much
from REANIMATOR as it does from THE HIDDEN.
     McNaughton made THE BORROWER between HENRY (which was made in 1985
but only released last year) and the Bogosian project; his next film,
MAD DOG AND GLORY (starring Robert DeNiro and produced by Martin
Scorsese) will be his first big-budget, major-studio release.  The
Phantom suspects that no matter what kind of film it is, everyone's head
will stay where it should and nary a giant bug will be seen.  Ah, the
price of commercial success....
     It's not worth going way out of your way to see THE BORROWER, but
it's certainly worth catching once it's released on video.  It's a film
that's probably best seen at midnight-only showings, but it should play
well enough at home, where you won't even have to dress all in black to
see it.

Title
Review for Leatherface: Texas Chainsaw Massacre III (1990)
     Any film that includes the quote "I'll be in hell for breakfast" can't be
all bad.  And LEATHERFACE isn't, really, although it certainly isn't all good,
either.
     On the other hand, the Phantom has been at his wits' end recently.
Christmas is always a bad time of year for him, and recently he even resorted
to renting SLEEPING BEAUTY again just to see a film -- any film -- that gives
him the shivers.  (Truthfully, the Phantom has yet to find anyone, himself
included, who isn't scared silly by the Evil Queen.)
     The Phantom should also point out that he although he is a big fan of the
original CHAINSAW, he was rather disappointed with its first sequel.  It just
seemed to trivialize what should have been a continuation of one of the most
terrifying horror films ever made.  Even Dennis Hopper, turning in one of his
most truly lunatic performances, couldn't save it.  So it was with some
trepidation that the Phantom purchased his ticket for part 3.
     LEATHERFACE arrived last week with quite excellent trailers, and the catch
phrase "The most controversial film since..." something or other.  The Phantom
can't quite remember, because although he, like every other horror fan, heard
the rumors about LEATHERFACE's release date being held up pending approval by
the MPAA, he has to admit that the film is resolutely ordinary and not in the
least controversial.  In fact, much of the film plays like the shower scene
from SCARFACE, except without Al Pacino's outrageous Cuban accent.  That is,
although most of the scenes have a violent tone about them, you really see very
little.  In fact, in the Phantom's opinion LEATHERFACE might even have gotten
away with a PG-13, assuming the censors (er, board members) were in a
charitable mood that day, and that they somehow came to believe that a film
about a family of cannibals and chainsaw-wielders required only "parental
guidance."
     More surprisingly, although the title and trailers emphasize Leatherface
and imply that he's Texas's equivalent of Jason, he's really on screen only
about half the time.  The other half is occupied by assorted members of his
creepy family -- a family, you phans may remember, that has been killed several
times over by now.  In fact, the connection between this film and its two
predecessors is not quite clear (except for the clever real-life connection
made by the folks at New Line between a familiar name and the guaranteed box
office receipts it will generate).  There *is* a brief explanation that scrolls
across the screen at the beginning of the film (this explanation is also read
aloud, as if in acknowledgment of the likely handicaps of the film's audience),
but it serves only as an excuse to get things going; really, it's nothing more
than the filmmakers' way of winking at the audience and saying, "We know you
like sequels, you know you like sequels... what do you want us to do, come up
with an original idea or something?"
     The film itself is well directed and edited and is generally suspenseful
throughout.  It's missing some big payoffs -- and if you expect serious,
high-tech, monster gore a la HELLRAISER you'll be disappointed -- but it has
enough little payoffs to make up for its lack of serious violence.  It even has
a few funny moments, although Leatherface will never be another Freddy; since
he doesn't speak, he's limited in the kind of material he can do.  But he's a
little more human than Jason, if that counts for anything.  The Phantom also
appreciated the feelings of tension and dread the film generated.  Although
things don't really get cooking (so to speak) until about half way through, the
beginning of the film is by no means boring or uneventful, and much of the film
is directed in such a way that you never quite know what's going to happen
next.  (The Phantom must admit, however, that he had his beeper turned on
during the film, and that his feelings of tension and dread may therefore have
had more to do with that than with the action on screen.)
     The plot (sans spoilers, of course) will be familiar to anyone who has
seen the original: a handful of happy-go-lucky folks get caught out in the
middle of Texas, lose their way or crash their cars or both, and find that the
woods hold more than just Smokey the Bear.  By the way, those woods have always
intrigued the Phantom; in the original CHAINSAW, they didn't really seem out of
place, although in LEATHERFACE we go from highway to scrub land to forest
awfully quickly.  The Phantom blinked and thought the action had shifted to
Vermont -- it was only the Texas drawls and the fact that the woods weren't
flowing with sap after Leatherface made a few swipes at the trees that made him
realize that no one had left the Lone Star state.
     They meet up with the first family of Texas (no, not the Bushes) and swing
axes, throw rocks, and run away from chainsaws until they finally convene for
dinner.  In fact, there's quite a bit of walking and running in this film, and
there are probably a dozen too many shots of people's legs moving this way and
that.  (Perhaps the producers were hoping for Reebok or Nike to cosponsor the
film, though the only product the Phantom noticed was a can of Diet Pepsi early
on.  Even the fabled chainsaw was generic!  Think of the missed advertising
opportunities here -- Leatherface could even do endorsements at local True
Value hardware stores nationwide...)
     Shortly thereafter some number of them escape (who escapes the Phantom
won't reveal, but suffice it to say that anyone who's ever seen a horror film
before will be able to guess).  Or possibly no one escapes -- the ending is
sufficiently dream-like to allow for the five minutes of concentrated
implausibility that ends the film and, of course, for the requisite sequel.
     That's the Phantom's best guess, anyway.  He thinks that dreams must have
played an important role in the making of LEATHERFACE, for certainly the
producers were under the impression that it might enjoy the mass-market appeal
of the original, and for them to think that implies either that they were
dreaming or that they never bothered to watch the film themselves.
     Still, LEATHERFACE is a fun film and never boring, and especially in this
season of post-Christmas letdowns, with no new horror fix in the foreseeable
future, it's worth a look before it hits your local Blockbusters.  It's a good,
solid, horror film that lacks only in the originality and creativity
departments.  But truthfully, the Phantom doubts that anyone could make a
really good sequel to the original CHAINSAW, and while he wasn't surprised that
LEATHERFACE did little more than reprise its more effective and more successful
predecessor, he will say that it is entertaining enough in its own right to
warrant a look.
     For those phans who like to take their film reviews with a dose of
relativity, the Phantom will say that LEATHERFACE is more enjoyable than either
of Jason's or Michael's most recent flicks, and that it is less stupid than
SHOCKER (though less original and less fun as well).
     But he still likes SLEEPING BEAUTY better....
